-Successful fundraising and event Planning
The operation is raising concerns over what happens under the terms of the US embargo, in the event of an incident at sea.
“If the broad light of day could be let in upon men’s actions, it would purify them as the sun disinfects.”
African Sports Monthly has a dedicated and very experienced staff across the world, starting with the founder himself Mr. Leslie Koroma in the USA, Mr. Muctaru Wurie, a seasoned sports journalist who recently relocated to the USA from Sierra Leone to join Mr. Leslie Koroma to take up a position as the Marketing Director (North America) alongside his journalist duties for the magazine. Mr. Ayodele Odumade, our resident London Writer and seasoned Sports Journalist, whose recent segment on the Magazine ‘Sports Talk’ made a splash with the fans and readers of the magazine.
Here she is modeling the Christmas pajamas I made her while she reads some sort of fascinating story. I think she loves the new seat. I wish you all could hear her jabber like crazy while she's "reading". If only I knew what she was saying.
It's week 10 of my little Waste Not Wednesdays challenge, to get us all using up those neglected stamps and stash. If you'd like to join in, just use something uninked or unused, or you could use paper scraps or those flowers you've got tucked away in a box - anything you like that needs using :o)
You don't have to worry. You grow up and you become able to express all of those
It's Wednesday & time for the launch of our new weekly challenge!
I'd really recommend getting together with a few friends in order to save money on bulk orders. And I'll definitely be organising a get together once we've all used our fabric. I love the idea of a group of women all surreptitiously showing each other their coat or skirt linings! A bit like Lefty from Sesame Street…
So I do hope you have better success at kicking old habits. And I also hope you have had a great laugh at my expense today. Just think, if laughter is the best medicine I just kicked your cold, fought your flu and sent you on your way to a wonderful week!
Should laugh and weep an hour upon the clock.
Reports of ongoing problems at Central Falls High School have dogged district officials since they fired then rehired the entire faculty. The dispute followed a disagreement with teachers’ union leaders over plans for a major high school overhaul.
Closer shot with a Nikon D7000 and Sigma 70-200 f2.8 lens.
The key to visitations
- Because I am apparently getting ornery with age, I ignored Boyce’s advice to use cold butter. I honestly thought it was a typo, because I’ve always had a hard time creaming butter that’s even a little bit too cold. Instead, I used softened butter. (I left it at room temperature until it was still cool to the touch but took the imprint of a finger when I pressed it. Perfect for creaming.) It worked just fine, as you can see. But I’ve now done some poking around online and see that the recipe is indeed supposed to use cold butter, cubed for easier creaming. Oops! So, uh, never mind me. Do whatever you want.
We really hope that this will be a resource not just for individuals, but also that schools and parishes will be able to distribute them to parents they are working with – e.g. parents whose children are starting at the school, or the parents of children on the First Holy Communion programme etc.
I brought in donuts this morning to start the festivities off right!
If you need proof that Tumblr is going mainstream - newspapers and magazines like The Atlantic, Rolling Stone, The New York Times, and Newsweek already have their official tumblr accounts sorted. One point to note: Tumblr users are mainly interested in high quality pictures as opposed to text, so make sure you're always uploading visually aesthetic images with a high resolution.
Feels like forever since I blogged. I have been playing with lots of new fragrances lately and find it so hard not to sneak just one more into the lineup of regular soaps :0) Can one really have too many options when it comes to fragrance ? I think there is always room for one more :0)
When I installed the lights, I built boxes out of drywall and sealed these boxes to the ceiling (above the lights, in the attic). I used Great Stuff to seal the boxes to the ceiling, and also to seal the hole where the cable goes through. All this sealing is important, because otherwise recessed lights act like, well, they act like a hole in the ceiling. Not great for insulation! When all my lights were boxed in, I filled the mudroom attic with about 4 ft deep of fiberglass insulation and closed it up. (I’ll do more about the insulation when I do the main attic)
On January 23, 1996 CSIRO was granted U.S. Patent No. 5,487,069 (“the ‘069 patent”) which is directed to addressing the "multipath" problem for indoor wireless networks (WLANs). CSIRO’s intent from the beginning was to derive revenue from its invention through licensing the ‘069 patent. The patent is considered by CSIRO to be a "core" patent for the IEEE 802.11a and 802.11g standards.
How do you write what is in your heart if you are fifteen years old, your mother tongue is Arabic or Somali or Amharic and you have only been in the UK for six months? This year I had the opportunity to work on a project organised by English PEN and the Tricycle Theatre, Kilburn, North London, for newly arrived young people. Last week we launched the anthology of their work, 'My Suitcase is Packed' at the theatre, with many of the young people reading on stage.
Since the demolition was scheduled by the state and not demanded by the court, the government has some flexibility in this matter. But the court must accept its request.
Compared to the 7 day avg before Escalation, the last 7 have seen a 14.7% increase in avg m3 mined in WH sec (from 2.8% to 4.7% of total)
The biggest problem that it seems to suffer from is that you can't display the results of your sniffing in realtime, like you can with Netmon or Ethereal when you're sniffing network packets, but even having to stop my captures, within a couple of minutes I had the all-important USB sVID/PID strings.
During times with the Lord, my prayer on a consistent basis is “Lord, don’t let this ugly thing creep up in my heart and life.” Sometimes as Christians it can be there and we don’t even realize it. We have to come to the place where we don’t mind saying and living, “I’m nothing Lord, it’s all about you.
A weekly feature hosted by GReads that showcases music. Book Playlists Edition is basically whatever songs you relate to a book or an author's actual playlist. This is obviously not the actual Harry Potter playlist that J.K Rowling wrote to, or had in mind, but this is my Harry Potter playlist. It's an odd combination, I won't deny that, but whenever I hear these songs, Harry and Hogwarts immediately comes to mind. Feels like deja vu sometimes actually!
Thank you to everyone that played along with us for our "Happy Birthday" challenge. We had some fantastic entries.
This is the kind of body I am aiming for because she's sexy, she's got curves, she's womanaly, what guy would say no to her? She's bloomin' gorgeous. I think this kind of figure is attainable for me because I have boobs, thighs and hips. But will I then be 'too big'? If I had her body and looked like that I'd be shouting from the rooftop and naked as much as possible. Haha.
A great trick I’ve been implementing are workout finishers. Basically it does what you think, finishes off your workout with a bang! At the end of your resistance training session, add on one of these finishers to maximize your post workout afterburn, boost your metabolism and continue burning calories for the next 24-48 hours. The series of moves gets your heart pumping and can last anywhere from 2-10 minutes total. One of the huge benefits – you don’t need any machines. So you don’t even need to be at the gym.
The Board then turned to the issue of likelihood of confusion because of concurrent use by the parties in common territories. User provided no evidence of overlap in the physical trading areas of the parties. However, the Board paused when considering the use of the marks on the Internet:
These were so simple to put together. Melt some chocolate and butter. Mix in some sugar, eggs, vanilla and flour. Fold in some chopped up peppermint patties. I have to admit, it seemed a terrible shame to me to "ruin" a perfectly delicious tasting brownie batter by adding the patties, but I went ahead and added them. Poured the whole bowl of batter into a buttered foil lined pan and baked away.
Dear followers, random people on the internet, etc.,
Check the returns policy
So, wherever you are this memorable day at 11 a.m. Take a moment to thank those who served their countries in the ultimate way.
The passed years we worked in a few other
The event started at 3.00 pm but Mommy only arrived there at almost 4.00 pm because Mommy wanted Juan Or to have more rest first before starting the journey (anyway Mommy felt uncertain too whether to go on with the plan or not). For your info, Juan Or had his UCSI kindy holiday programme class for the whole morning till 12.30 pm and on top of that, Juan Or had vomitted three times in the morning, had no appetite for milk or food and even complained of stomach pain that went off and on throughout the morning and afternoon. His vomit looked slimy which from Mommy's experience, indicates gassy stomach.
Oh, the next day I went back for lunch. By myself. That's dedication, baby. I saw that battered Crispy Cod & Chips ($10.95) on the menu and had to come back to test it out, since I'm always searching for the best beer battered fish. I thought - if anyone is going to have the best fish and chips... it's going to be Mitchell's. And I'll tell ya that theirs was, as expected, one of the best I've had. Mmm, that batter. But I don't have pics from that occasion so I'll stop rambling on about it.
Kristen Hersh
The dangerous ground that is no longer
Day by day, as the house reveals more and more of its forgotten beauty, Eugenie sees her dream come to fruition-especially when the attentions of two men help to reawaken in her feelings of romance and passion she thought were gone forever. As she navigates her rediscovered emotions, Eugenie comes to realize that there is no such thing as irreparable damage-not in herself, not in the house on Butterfly Way, and not in the family who now calls it home.
Recently, we have been approached by a few college students asking about internship opportunities at Events by Evonne. As our 2009 wedding season is fast approaching, it's time to start the search and the interviews.
I haven't really openly blogged about this yet, however I tiled all my own floors. The above shot is what the bathroom floor looks like. Adding the little black diamonds was extra work, but the result is well worth it!
1. Cook the shrimp with some salt and turmeric powder. Cook potatoes and mash it and set it aside.
Getting to Know the Different Trampoline Parts
I have just bought me 5 SMASH books. Im such a happy girl!!!:)
The good news is that international concerns about global imbalances may be much less pressing than many think. The bad news is that conventional balance-of-payments measures are clearly less reliable in a world of rising intra-firm trade and complex supply chains. That matters because dodgy statistics lead to policy mistakes. Governments should clean the figures up.
- Anne Hill
DiS: I believe you had initially started writing the follow-up to Med Sud I Eyram Vid Spilum Endalaust as far back as 2009, but that it was scrapped several times? Have any of the songs from those sessions made it onto Valtari, and if not, will they be released in the future?
Dads work hard, so they appreciate Father’s Day gifts that help them relax. “Poker night with the boys” is more common in late night reruns than most suburban homes, but it hasn’t gone the way of the vinyl record yet. Poker is more than just a way to trade money; it is something to do with the hands while men talk about manly things. Dad doesn’t gamble? Not a problem with the many indoor games on today’s market. Board games include chess, backgammon or darts. For the bigger game room, a billiards table or billiards accessories. They are all gift ideas for Dads they will be grateful for every time they play.
Use a measuring cup to measure the liquid obtained after straining out the herb. Dilute that liquid with an equal amount of water. For example, if you got 2 cups of liquid add 2 cups water (+/- depending on how pronounced you want you jelly to taste). For every 6 cups of diluted liquid you will need 75g of tapioca starch (+/- depending on how firm you want you jelly to be).
You have to wait, man, unreal, for shame.
3. Allow myself on grace for rule #1 if I go camping by either posting "advance" blessing counts, or posting "make-up" blessing counts. On an occasional, extremely rare basis, we actually camp in areas where no cell/internet coverage is available.
Big round of applause for Grace C.! Please leave your e-mail address in a comment for me so we can get in contact. Way to go!
and God is not using you the way you
Which song? Icarus
We should on the contrary focus more on how the form itself can contribute to a sustainable environment, not only because – as the studies by Newman and Kenworthy on the compact city were pointing out – a specific form is more or less dissipative, but also because from a true ecological approach, sustainability cannot be reduced to an energy issue, but should concern the social one too.
This has been the hot question lately, everyone asking "do you know what you are having, yet?" When I tell them no not yet, I then get asked "What do you think it is?"
I don't feel like I can be truly honest about what I'm feeling like and that's hard. I've put a lot of effort into growing this blog and it isn't as private as it used to be. People I know in real life read what I write - although some deny it strongly which I will never understand - and that means I have to censor much of what I discuss here.
It's not something I was really aware of at the time, but one of the real bonuses I got from having 'older' parents was the music that I was brought up with. At school, many of my friends had mums and dads who were into the Beatles, the Rolling Stones, The Who etc etc. But mine were fans of music from decades earlier, and I was brought up on a heavy diet of easy listening... Sinatra, Crosby, Mathis, Nat Cole etc etc. I don't think I appreciated that much of it at the time, but it was the soundtrack to my early years, and as I've got older, I've noticed that much of it has matured in my brain, and I now genuinely enjoy most of the artists that my parents liked. I see this as a complete 'Brucey Bonus' as this is in addition to all the music I've discovered on my own. It works like a dream, and the combination of the two gives me an interest in music spanning from the 30's right up to today, and I'm pleased to be able to appreciate such a wide variety of music. And I really don't care if it's cool or not, if I like it, that's good enough for me!
· Relational database experience
My group had bought hot dogs before the show, but they weren’t ready and the girl at concessions told us she would bring them in to us when they were done. But after about 15 minutes I figured I should go check on them and ended up missing about 3-5 minutes of the beginning of the movie right there. By the time I got back to my seat and got comfortable we were already 15-20 minutes into the movie. We had gotten to the theatre plenty early, but with the lack of previews and the hot dog fiasco I felt like I had come into the movie late, and there is a good reason I don’t like showing up to movies late. You feel like you’re trying to catch up rather than enjoying what it going on. Heck, I went and saw “The Hunger Games” a second time because the first time we showed up late and the movie had already started, only to find out that all I had missed was a black screen with white lettering briefly explaining the future in which the movie takes place.
Skin - E0000, 000, 00, 11 and chalk for cheeks
Then I launched into a major critique of the SLMA and was doing a pretty good hatchet job on the Quadrangle when suddenly Councilor Kelly told me that I had only twenty seconds left! You would think they would give me more time considering how articulate I was being, but no. That angered me, so I told them that since they wouldn't let me continue I was leaving City Hall this instant and with nothing but complete contempt for the City Council. Several jackasses in the audience burst out laughing.
Where have all the baptisms gone, long time passing?
Because we moved from a dark, dreary townhouse, our current home was specifically designed to have plenty of windows to allow lots of natural light to flow into the rooms. Also, our house, specifically downstairs, is kind of “open” without much wall space, so there isn’t a lot of room for hanging art and photos.
What place does free will have in this film? What weight is given to it?
You inspire me with your stories. With your strength. With your love.
Gardening is a wonderful hobby to share with your children. You do not need to dedicate a huge amount of space and if you live in an apartment you can even use containers or window boxes.
well, it stopped raining for a while and we braved the wet and the mud.
There is not much to Nieu Bethesda. Dusty streets. The melancholic air of a place without identity. Some tourists around, trying hard to enjoy the visit. We found accommodation at Bruno’s guest house and pizzeria. A somewhat rundown establishment but, methinks, probably as good as it can get in NB, as us old hands call the town.
It was recently that I realized no amount of love would be enough.
Lastly, we can pray this helpful prayer: Lord, how can I love my spouse today like he/she’s never been loved and will never be loved?
Or perhaps “Blasphemous” might be a better word choice.
Interested parties should submit resume, application, and references to Rick Bagley, News Director, KFSM-TV, 4201 North Shiloh Drive, Suite 169, Fayetteville, AR 72703 or e-mail jobs@kfsm.com or fax 479-521-6579. No phone calls.
Awkward moment when Rue is some black girl and not the little blonde innocent girl you picture
Me down to stay; you mine-field with the sun,
Veggies and protein source for lunch
7. Future Of The Left - I Am The Least Of Your Problems
Think of the work to be done. Joplin faces so much rebuilding. Think of families like Will’s who will never go back to normal again. You can never go back after a disaster like that.
Today I got email from my old friend. Made me smile. She’s been away thinking, and came back with some newly found strength to carry on. That makes me happy to know. I’ve never doubted she would pull through, and I’m not going to start now.
Dear camerado! I confess I have urged you onward with me, and still
- Went skiing again and got up on the wakeboard immediately. Something clicked and I just got it, that happened to two other guys too. More fun than skis, but harder to cross the wake. I really need to bring a videocamera with me next time so I can document the spectacular wipeouts while tubing.
'A great read' - Dougie Jackson, Drivetime host, Smooth Radio 105.2
06 Sister Ray (Live from the Moonlight Club, London 2 April 1980)
Suan Thai Panin Centre Building
when I read the theme "slow down and look back" I realized that I hadn't slowed down in awhile. my mind has been on overload and chaos mode for quite some time now.
It can be very, very painful to the point where just swallowing saliva is impossible. Some infants need to go on IV as they refuse to have any fluids in their mouths and even dribble out all their saliva.
The reality, however, is not only that our troops should not be there in any case (and never should have been, for they are two patches of howling desert that have nothing to do with Britain) but that Islamist ‘extremists’ need no ‘inflaming’. The massively influential Wahhabi and Deobandi sects behind most Sunni ‘extremism’ were alive and kicking, against the West in general and Britain in particular, decades or indeed a century before the state of Israel came into existence.
Gommage treatment with enzyme & yogurt to exfoliate and nourish complexion and remove oil, dirt and excess.
to you
4) Optional extra: Post a comment here at www.verygoodtaste.co.uk linking to your results.
In "The Fundamental Freedom of Furnishings", Hugo posted a short note on this weblog on Case C-5/11 Donner. The question on which the German Bundesgerichtshof seeks a preliminary ruling from the Court of Justice of the European Union is this:
More?
As the Zambonis left the ice, the skaters began to prepare for their races. Jonathan came out for his on-ice warm up quite early, and I snapped a few photos of him. Here he is rounding the corner, in the blue warm-up lane…
Though when I get out
Last night, we looked over our tax return and figured out how we wanted to use the money we received and decided to pay off his truck. Oh it felt great. It FEELS great. We had everything set up to transfer the funds to his auto loan. We looked at each other wide-eyed, excited, and nervous. We gave each other a gentlemanly hand shake, because I think you do that in big decisions, or something? Stuart said, "Let's hit the button together!" And then accidentally fell and hit the button without me. It transacted and we sat shocked for a moment and then excitedly we both started to laugh. It was thrilling. And I love seeing this.
So, when he had accepted the title of Consular and an assignment had come through to safeguard a Corellian Senator—a Duros who had once been suspected of ties to the Sacking of Coruscant eight years ago, but had since been proven innocent by a committee of peers—Ken had jumped at the chance. His excitement had been on the verge of overwhelming for the whole trip to and his first few weeks on Corellia. So much so that Skottz, one of the Senator’s personal guards, had made mention of it via the silly grin that seemed permanently plastered to his face. A revelation that had caused him several moments of intense embarrassment.
Junga: And Sigur Rós. I envy them for their performance on stage.
Now secondly, what about those who already are in depression? For those already in depression what they need is a true friend. Not a consular, not medication, not therapy, and etc. They need a true friend. Someone who will listen to all their problems, someone who doesn’t judge, who doesn’t get angry at their mistakes, who is always there for them, who knows their past and still accepts them the way they are, who they can trust, and so on. Actions speak louder than words. To have someone tell you they care for you means nothing, but to have someone who tells you they care for you and will do anything for you is what counts, that is what will make a difference.
4. Gigantic
Pelecanos isn’t just writing a mystery either. He’s writing about D.C., albeit a different D.C. than you see when you go for the tour or when you watch “The West Wing.” I’m not as familiar with this part of the city, so I was happy that I was reading it on the iPad, so I could keep switching between the Kindle app and the Google Maps StreetView app to look at the locations he was describing. It was great fun to eyeball the very real and accurately described places and settings featured in the book. I can’t wait to check out some of the bars Spero visits.
I have become irrevocably attached to Jeromy and his heroic tale; I know that many readers will feel the same way, and I hope you will give him a glance and find out whether he is able to break your heart and put it back together.
"um. I sneezed a big sneeze and now there is something on my shirt and I don't know what it is but I need you to get it off. Because it's gross. Yeah, mommy, really gross. Please come get it. Yechhh."
From what I have seen, we are often treated as second class citizens by students, teachers, parents, and administrators. Now, I have been lucky enough to be in some schools that do otherwise (I am in one right now), and I have made some teacher friends who certainly don't treat me that way.
- Individuals/families making less than $43,320/$88,200 per year will qualify for government subsidies to help purchase health insurance
Pre-Registration is currently OPEN and will close September 1st, 2012.
About cultural mapping
We’ve tried a few brands, including Pampers, Merries, Moony and Goo.n. We’ve been using mostly Pampers for the small size, though we’ve been using Goo.n recently. The small size Moony diapers leaked a bit more than others, though Pampers and Goo.n have been leaking a lot lately.
If anyone anywhere happens to read this and wants to chime in, please do so! I for one would like to see what you say. Please leave the name of the organization and your comments in the comment section of this post.
I leave the world of bartending with no regrets. I've worked behind the bar at a variety of places, each one teaching me a thing or two about myself and mankind in general. I cherish all of my stories, both good and bad. I loved the flexible schedule bartending gave me to pursue my dreams and hobbies. I appreciated always having cash in my hand. I enjoyed teaching people my craft during my stint as a bartending school instructor. Most importantly, I've loved sharing all of my stories, experiences and advice with my loyal blog readers.
Brown Rice Bread: less than 1 hour active time; 2-3 hours passive time
The Green Investment Bank was awarded unsurprisingly to Edinburgh, but reading the Welsh Government's bid you have to wonder if they ever took the bid process seriously?
Artists@ellebefilms.com
Last week I was at an excellent seminar organized by Virus Bulletin and the Open University and expertly chaired by David Phillips at Milton Keynes. All the presentations are now available on the Virus Bulletin site here. I suspect that readers of this blog will be particularly interested in a presentation by Paul Baccas of Sophos on ‘Is the Apple walled garden enough to protect you?‘
- to provide this accommodation Ireland needs a properly functioning and highly skilled property development and management sector;
I received 6 of the ales Nigel makes, and below are a few quick tasting notes on each:
Packing is something that I dearly enjoy when setting off on a trip. Just the anticipation, knowing that in a few hours/days/weeks (noooo…I woudn’t pack THAT early, would I?) I will be blissfully wandering the streets of ________________.
While the traditional camel color is classic, I love the updated colors and embellishments (the chunky studs on the Proenza Schouler bag make me swoon as does the price on the red hot iguana version!) You can still get a neutral color, but spring is the time to bring a fun, bright color as well!
But a shadow lurks in every fairy tale… Nell's uncontrolled use of the Wealding Word soon attracts the attention of a demonic creature known as a Malady. It isn’t long before the demon’s dark influence begins to ruin Nell's life.
But kept it high amongst the trees
Vancouver – Almost Third Wave with the new bike deck on the Canada Line Bridge over the Fraser River. Depending on the route you choose, a combination of bike routes, bike lanes, and a bike path on the airport property gets you to the terminal. There are sections missing. Leaving the airport, bike lanes get you to the river.
Americans are constantly confusing me. The things they get up to, the shows they watch on TV, the food they eat, I just don’t understand those land of the free-ers. I’ve tried to understand Twinkies, I really tried, but it didn’t work and it was about then that I gave up on trying to understand America.
And I would’ve reached out if I could
Act 2: The Wheels Come Off
Anyway.... good to know that it comes down now to people actually reading the books. I was always really disappointed in previous years to see BFS members saying they had cast their votes the second the shortlist was announced. If I get time I'd love to work my way through some of the nominees as usual, even if this year it won't make any difference to the results.
Have a nice day
This is my girls’ bedroom. We were provided with a bunk bed from my husband’s office as the room is quite small for two beds. It works great. My younger daughter, who is two, used to sleep in her crib up till the end of this past June and now sleeps on the lower level of the bunk bed. She fell off the bed once and landed on the marble floor. Now I tuck in the blanket under the mattress and she hasn’t fallen off the bed since then.
So as I lay there surrounded wrapped in a blanket of security woven by the love of my children, I allowed myself a few moments to remember some of the things I did right in the early years - and I took pride in them.
Some time back I called the tech department for my computer. Now, that’s a trip if there ever was one. It’s difficult enough to understand what’s being said and follow instructions over the phone. Add a foreign accent to the mix and it’s pure chaos.
You can use any type of citrus fruit for variation. That would be your version...
I have some old outfits to show you, I have also changed my make up a bit thanks to some girls' tips, now it looks much better!
Produced by Reliance Pictures, the film also features southern actress Kajal Aggarwal. Both lead actors will be joining the crew in Goa as Singham goes on floors Wednesday.
On November 30, 1961 aggressive covert operations against the communist government of Fidel Castro in Cuba was authorized by President Kennedy
The background paper is from prima, the strip paper is Webster, the card and other paper is from kasiercraft. The clock is also from kasiercraft paper. The 'forever' butterfly, love heart and words around clock are from Webster pages, Flowers are Prima , so is the ink I used and other letter in title from October Afternoon. the punch I used is from Stampin'up
If I've written a blog post assignment, this is simple as I just encode the URL, they snap the picture and can mark it on their mobile device.
Note: the dough can get really hard. When you take it out of the fridge and it is too hard to form into balls, let it stay for a while at room temperature. The balls do not have to have the perfect form.
So the first project is one I've been wanting to try for a while, but haven't had the guts to. My mom bought me a china plate from the thrift store a few months ago, specifically for this project. But it just goes against the grain to BREAK something like a china plate. So it's taken me until now to work it up to take a hammer to it.
That's why there's a rule against ex sex.
Reagan enjoyed these sweet little candies so much that he later sent a letter to the chief executive of the company that produced them, stating, "we can hardly start a meeting or make a decision without passing around the jar of jelly beans."
How have you handled your own dark characters? Can you think of other imperfect protagonists in literature and what has hooked you to them?
* Wayne Douglas Morgan as Merman
I've been duct-taping my phone to the fence post to take videos to judge my position--glad it didn't fall down in the wind! I intended to post the first couple videos, but they were pretty horrendous so they don't need to be floating all over the Internet. I am still moving back and forth slightly too much at the canter--that motion should be going up through my back, not from front to back (if that makes sense). I'm also seeing a weird wiggly motion in my back at the trot. I wonder if it has anything to do with the pain/stiffness I feel in my lower back when I lay down flat. I didn't get too excited about my birthday this year, but maybe 22 will turn out to be a milestone year after all. My first chiropractic adjustment!
I have been driving past, and even ordering food from, this Burger King, for ten years or more, and I never realized it had a play place! It seems like most of the Burger Kings around here have eliminated their play places. Anyway, a parent at Little Bear's school mentioned that she and other moms often take their kids to this Burger King because it is cleaner and less crowded than most of the McDonalds Play Places. Of course, Little Bear, Rafael, Pufferfish and I had to go see for ourselves!
Life Experience (Tarshish/Colony)
I also pulled out the new Fruit & Flowers set for this card. Oh so cute! The sentiment is from Word Play. And look, there's that Wisteria Wonder again. I am obsessed lately. : )
No related posts.
Jon Anderson (Vocals),
Websites of note:
a rag tag army that cannot cater for
Since the beginning of the Arab Spring, Saudi King Abdullah almost doubled his Kingdom’s budget, committing billions in subsidies, pensions and pay raises in an effort to keep his subjects from storming the palaces.
Today is the shortest and darkest day of the year, there is little colour in the countryside and most of the trees are bare but from this point on the days will slowly lengthen and in a few short weeks we shall see the first signs of Spring appearing. Winter is a time of slowing down and resting and if we are wise we also will use the winter to rest and reflect and renew our energy ready for the coming of Spring. A Happy and Peaceful Solstice to you all.
Don’t stay back with the last trend ay, man
The words “living memory” compel me to ensure that my history doesn’t fade into the mists of time. My kids have not matured quite enough to grasp history’s importance or its connection to the lives they lead now. Everything with the kids is about now, now, now. Things appear on the horizon – news, ideas, technology – so fast now we can barely keep up. Horse and buggies – are you serious? Rotary phones, hand tools, rabbit ear antennaes…and no such things as iPods!
MW: The Democrats don’t benefit from this this close to the election. It puts them on the defensive. Even if you argue that it seems that the ethics investigation process is working, the Democrats having to defend the process at this time doesn’t help the party. It’s hurtful because it gives the Republicans a chance to say, “See the Democrats have all those problems over there.” I don’t know if they’ll do that because they’re a lot of Republicans that have been investigated. But there’s nothing positive in this for the Democrats.
In it, he continues to compare British troops with the terrorists who carried out 9/11 and 7/7, accuses them of serious and despicable crimes, and urges all British citizens to blame the soldiers if they don't support the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan.
I am very blessed to still have both my mom and MIL here… in fact, they both live less than 10 miles from me. But even if you don’t get to enjoy your mom’s company there must be someone in your life who takes on that role for you? This blog hop is all about celebrating that special mom figure in your life.
Fairies are generally portrayed as human in appearance and as having supernatural abilities such as the ability to fly, cast spells and to influence or foresee the future. Although in modern culture they are often depicted as young, sometimes winged, females of small stature, they originally were depicted much differently: tall, radiant, angelic beings or short, wizened trolls being some of the commonly mentioned. Diminutive fairies of one kind or another have been recorded for centuries, but occur alongside the human-sized beings; these have been depicted as ranging in size from very tiny up to the size of a human child. Even with these small fairies, however, their small size may be magically assumed rather than constant.
Are you planning on using any other states for your board series?
I’m stealing the title of this post from his awesomeness King Shamus, whose hilarious take on the subject can be found here (many thanks for the for the linkie).
*1 egg
Pink, I hate you.
More than likely it will be a night spent with the family, of course. I'm usually not that fond of driving around on New Years. There's some pretty stupid drunk drivers.
Miz Gould Keil's unidentified source snitched to her that the board took umbrage with the number of the sheikh's wives (2), the number of children (15) and the "boatload of staffers" that typically accompany the Qatari diplomat wherever he goes. "'It's just too complicated,'" explained Miz Gould Keil's source.
To some who are near my heart,
Place the rabbit in the crock pot and pour the Onion Soup Mix over it. A little garlic powder and the salt and pepper next. Put your veggies in on top. Dissolve bouillon cubes in warm water and add to the pot. Cover the veggies with water. Set your crock pot on low and give it several hours. (I use this for tough rabbits)
there’s no good
An index of 100 is equal to the average level of contract activity during 2001, which was the first year to be examined as well as the first of five consecutive record years for existing-home sales; it coincides with a level that is historically healthy.
Gulmarg Skiing had become very popular during the pre-independence years and Gulmarg used to host two main events, one each during Christmas and Easter. In 1938-39 about 500 skiers are reported to have participated in the Christmas and Easter ski races. Gulmarg’s atmosphere can generally be identified with 1940′s and 50′s European skiing—‘the Alps of good old days’.
I’ve travelled to enough places to know that the familiar tends to temporarily fade in the face of the new, novel, unique. Oh, why can’t we be just like this, do things exactly like they do here? If only we were on permanent vacation life would be so grand.
D-Crit, the graduate program in design criticism at School of Visual Arts, has just minted their third class of MFA students. “Eventually Everything,” a half-day conference featuring talks by the students and invited design professionals took place this past Wednesday. Unfortunately, I was unable to
The finals are tandem passes, referred as Tsuisō. Drivers are paired off, and each heat comprises two passes, with each driver taking a turn to lead. The best of the 8 heats go to the next 4, to the next 2, to the final. The passes are judged as explained above, however there are some provisos such as:
M was really excited. Seemingly this is what we've been pushing for.. And it's apparently going to be confusing and unsettling for a while until I learn to sit with my emotions and sort through them rather than run away from them.
No exceptions, no clauses, no loopholes, no hyphens. If it is an animal product, it is not vegan.
What are you doing today?
It is so sweet to watch your raghead ass,
enemy agents. He turns to be a torturer and executioner by firing
12:27 In answer to a question, Maryetta Ables gives a rundown of the US tea party movement.
In the music store, asking for Rutter’s Requiem,
And it was all worth it to see an excavator on a barge!
I held out my hand and said, Hi, I’m Harold. At that very moment, her face turned red, she squeezed her fists together – sort of reminded me of that little nimrod in the restaurant awhile back – and just blew the biggest gas I have ever heard creep from some female’s backdoor beehive.
Hi all, hope you are all well.
Last week was a pretty eventful one. I was informed of a job opportunity, had an interview, and got it all in a matter of 2 days. I am going to be the manager of our apartment complex! I have mixed feelings about this, but have mainly felt excited and like it is supposed to happen. I have been bored the last couple months and I think this is exactly what I needed. I thrive on change I think. I love our apartment and my life, but I just love to mix things up every so often!
Ryan got up and opened the back door of the wagon. Looking back at her, he almost whispered, “No.” Then, he was gone.
Why do I keep doing this shit to myself?! Why the don’t I just become an agoraphobe and never leave my house. Every time I get in that damn tin can of despair known as public transportation, something happens that makes me lose even more faith in humanity. I started out with no faith. I now have a negative million and six faith units of faith, a unit of measurement I invented just to give you a tangible figure for my plight. That’s a lot of faith units lost thanks to a bunch of poor fucks on wheels.
Judge # 1 -- A mediocre chili with too much reliance on canned peppers.
He has discovered that ghost lights and other anomalous happenings seem to occur all over the world within 15 to 20 miles north of the 30th degree line of North Latitude. He believes these paranormal hot spots to be “window areas” (to borrow a phrase from paranormal writer John Keel) that lead into other dimensions, and that the ghost lights herald the manifestation of beings from other dimensions into our own.
I totally adore all of the following things.
The tech made it before 4:30 PM and my phone works again. Like somebody who made a promise to god in order to get out of a jam – and survived – I don’t feel much like keeping my promise to get a cell phone. But really it is time, or is it?
Ok, so not as pretty as Peet’s but come on, I was trying to get this thing finished so I could drink it ;-) You wouldn’t like me before my morning coffee!
Ah yeah the old dependable race card: if everything else fails, you know someone is gonna throw it out as a last resort .
My philosophy has followed the strength of that marriage and this workshop is about those two very things. We are going to spend 3 very intense days working from the inside-out. Working out who you are as a photographer and your style, and helping you carry that through to your photos as well as your business and brand. Sounds scary? It is! But that is the fun of it - Learning to be a better photographer AND a better entrepreneur! :)
“Just now, when you were doing all that talking. What do I like to wear in the summer?” he asked. “Shorts,” he answered. “And when I’m not wearing boat shoes, I like wearing sandals. I think that’s a good look. It’s casual. It’s a good summer look. What do you think?”
Next on the agenda was a CT scan. I lay there and listened to the instructions. "Take a deep breath. Now hold your breath. Now breathe." I did that a couple times. But the final time lasted like 20 minutes. I couldn't hold my breath that long. I got dizzy. There was almost a code blue right there in the CT room. I finally breathed and hoped they wouldn't yell at me for it.
Cast : Wendy Delorme, Mad Kate, Sadie Lune, Metzgerei Metzgerei, Judy Minx, Madison Young
Are the NTC mills really running?
I was brought up in the northeast of England (God's own country), went to university in Bristol and worked for the rest of the 80's in London. When I first moved to the States, I lived in Dallas, but the rest of the time has been spent trying to come to terms with the oppressively hot summers and unbearably frigid winters of Chicago.
Computers are the career computer science before enrolling in any computer science education, you may earn a lot more. This is the case because many individuals continue education after a few of the worlds most exciting industry. An online computer science along with your computer science schools are also offered. Gather employer-specific data to be paid between $30,000 and $70,000.
Moving forward from this daily unfolding debacle (soon, I hope), I believe it’s only fair that all right-minded MPs, ADUNs and would be candidates-for-office declare, in advance, their principles and personal manifestos to the voting public.
On monday I read that green tea should be great for loosing weight. So, I bought some:
Squeeze the juice of half of one lime into the bowl. Add salt to taste and stir again. Serve with your favorite chips, or on nachos, on a salad.
I heard the other day / week / month that HTML5 had drawing stuff in it (never did do one in SVG for some reason, maybe I still should), and so I did that: here it is over on david chess dot com (I don’t think WordPress lets me write all that JavaScript, or embed it here via an iFrame or anything, so there is just a teaser image on this page here).
It's a colorful interactive basic skill builder that is software you download on your computer. There are two versions for varying memory amounts so you can read how to ck that on your own system. It was easy for me to navigate~IF I CAN, you will be able to...I am so techno challenged in this way!
"There needs to be another word for it."
So we had a weekend in the sunshine. Yesterday the older kids came home from the youth conference, all encouraged and happy and full of good things to talk about. We ate our lunch out on the deck. Evelyn Joy kept reminding me how she has been telling me for a few weeks that she needs some things from the dollar store for her school project. Since I knew we were almost out of milk and bread and bananas...I said I would take her. (We couldn't go Monday because there is a school band concert, and Tuesday is girls' fellowship, ect ect.) So we went. She got the little girls dressed and brushed their hair into little ponytails, and off we went. I think I am the only lady in the world who can spend $82 at the dollar store. Since there is sales tax on non-food items, that means I bought at least seventy something things. Hair things and napkins and Gihardelli chocolate covered caramels and four new big plastic bowls for salads and bags of chocolate peanutbutter Bugles and some socks (three packs for a buck, can't beat that) and some things for Charlotte's birthday, which is Friday. Even for me, that was a lot!
Park Ha goes back outside to think about her life and Yi Gak joins her. There’s more awkward silence so she decides to make an excuse about needing to go out and buy fruit in the middle of the night. When she starts to leave, he does one of my favorite kdrama moves and grabs her wrist. All he needed to say was “kajima” and I would have been his for the rest of the series. I didn’t get that and instead, he asks her if it’s really true that she likes him.
Finally, I found a way to combine math with another subject! While studying ancient Greece, Casia learned about a mathematician named Thales. He figured out the height of a pyramid using its shadow. So Casia, Garrett and I took a field trip to the beach where there are plenty of tall buildings casting shadows onto the sand.
The 1960′s was perhaps the first decade created in the media.
The solution sounds simple enough, take out the plot outline and move that scene up and be vicious with scenes I’ve already written and make some cuts of those that don’t advance the story line. But I am whining and dragging my feet at the prospect of actually doing this.
a single thing.
I tried to pick up on the comical elements of the Book of Esther, as wonderfully described in the JPS commentary by Adele Berlin.
look to them that reminds me of the movies my mates and I where making in the early nineties. Plot was always secondary to the effects. It was all about the effects, the violence, and the cheap gory special effects the entire production circled around. Well, that’s exactly what Olaf Ittenbach’s early movies are all about. Shallow stories primarily designed to showcase his moments of gore and splatter. The Burning Moon has some delightfully classic old school effects, body parts chopped off, dismemberments, headshots, throat slits and human torment effects which still today are impressive. Fuck you CGI, you can never mimic reality as well as enthusiasm, latex and fake blood.
I invite you to not tear me apart for what I'm about to tell you. I'm embarrassed to admit that I did it. I've been hiding it for a while now. But I've just gotta ask. Just gotta.
Easy Salt-Free Vegan Pate Recipe:
First of all! Thank you so much to everyone who commented on the flash fiction piece! You guys are awesome. I was grinning all last week!
Just watched this film at the weekend and thought it was well good to ok nothing special, nothing even memorable but it wasn’t bad. It was basically Rock ‘Em Sock ‘Em Robots turned into a movie, but unlike the battleship being converted to a film they didn’t have fun with it, but instead decided to go more serious with a bit of a gritty back story and a bad father son dynamic. A gritty, white-knuckle, action ride set in the near-future where the sport of boxing has gone high-tech, Real Steel stars Hugh Jackman as Charlie Kenton, a washed-up fighter who lost his chance at a title when 2000-pound, 8-foot-tall steel robots took over the ring. Tim’s Film Reviews: wait till it comes out on TV.
Why is it that moving always kicks up the most dust and fur and dirt? We have hardwoods, and apparently, cat hair and dust just collects in the strangest places you wouldn't think to look, so when you start moving things, all that dust and hair comes poofing out.
Still, it is clear that Israeli West Bank settlements and the Government’s hesitation in condoning a potentially threatening physical Palestinian State configuration are not rooted in Israeli arrogance. Instead they are anchored in real security concerns. It is hard to imagine that Israel or any nation would compromise immediate national security interests just to satisfy a foreign audience. Their growing urgency is a direct reflection of the real threats they are facing. There are reports describing state and citizen initiatives to build bunkers in order to survive future confrontations with Iran, Hezbollah, and perhaps others. These responses are rational in light of a zero-sum gain dilemma, one in which the U.S. will never be perceived as an honest broker. Unfortunately, they will not help Israel’s most vulnerable citizens to survive emergent threats.
Hopeless, Dennis and Jamie McKelvie X-Men : Season One. 2012 Marvel Comics
The patriarch of the family, Sir Harry Trevelyan-Tubal, has had a stroke and no one can understand him but his devoted old maid secretary, Estelle. The bank has been put in the hands of the younger son, Julian, as his older brother took off to find himself in the world of international adventure after the death of their mother. Julian and his right-hand-man, Nigel, both got caught up in hedge fund mania, and the Trubal bank is in just as much trouble as all the "new money" banks in London. They can't let anyone know about it because they hope to sell the bank to an American conglomerate and get out while the getting is good. In the meantime, Fleur, Harry's much younger trophy wife, is on unsteady footing with the family; Artair MacCleod (playwright, director, and Fleur's ex-husband) has stopped receiving his long-term "grant" from the Trubal estate (which was basically a pay off for letting Fleur go); and Melissa Tregarthen, a young Cornish journalist, is sent off to interview MacCleod about his new play but ends up uncovering a major banking scandal.
Traditional media outlets like radio and TV are turning more and more towards the new class of internet writers and bloggers. If a major TV show or radio program comes calling wanting to interview you, you'll need to be prepared to be beamed into millions of homes around the world. Do your homework and watch how other authors and writers handle different interviewers.
Climate change has had a direct effect on national security, Defense Secretary Leon Panetta said this week. Panetta told an audience at the Environmental Defense Fund that climate change has raised the need for humanitarian assistance and disaster relief, hitting national security in the process. (Yeah, them wind-powered tanks and solar-powered jets are a problem. ~Bob.)
Gosh, What a trooper! Forced on a two mile leisurely stroll along the river in the spring on a cool breezy day, sun shining brightly, with only 5 or 10 opportunities to strop and drink or play in the water. How do you tolerate such torture? Of course, technically, if you plop down on the side of the trail every 50 feet and refuse to move, I think it is classified as a “drag” rather than a “walk.”
The new car will once again be a turbo diesel powerplant with hybrid technology as we have seen. Stored kinetic energy will be deployed to the front wheels for a boost of around 70bhp.
Don't forget to grab the winner's logo to display on your blog if you wish.
I’ll be chatting along with Frank of Franktalks.com and Dr. Laurie about this very timely topic, and hopefully a little bit about my books too.
(1 Corinthians 15:20-23 ESV)
Step by step I’m learning about New Zealand’s wonderful nature. Very slowly, for my mind is talented in forgetting names and details. I know so little about them yet. But you don’t have to know all about them to like them or be amazed by them.
2007 saw the sacking, for one reason or another, of key members who questioned Head Office or the leadership on its financial irregularities, poor judgements on national campaigns and faux pas to the media. Also the accounts were being submitted late to the Electoral Commission. The bigger the Party became, the more Head Office tightened its control. Yes-men were continuing to be appointed at the expense of those with ability. Councillors, especially sole councillors were becoming despondent. It was more and more difficult to keep up the momentum, given that the grass roots were being starved of resources. And there was still no Party back-up provided to councillors. Councillors started resigning due to the pressure and lack of support.
Recently I blogged about Values. My definition of Integrity is that Integrity is taking your values and holding them to a high standard. It is about being honest and consistent in how you apply your values in life and business. Integrity and Time Management – a Great Way to Start!
-Math is going well, Wesley has memorized addition from 0+0 to 12+12 as well as subtraction from 0-0 to 11-11. We are still using TouchMath.
One thing I noticed with this design is that this shirt makes you look bustier. I don’t want to give an impression that I like to talk about stuff like that as I wrote a post where I mentioned the size of chest in the recent past. I feel that I can’t help talking about how my body looks in certain clothes sometimes… Forgive me! I usually look pathetic in a T-shirt (sad, sad), but in this shirt, without using a Victoria’s Secret’s super push-up bra (I don’t own one anyways. What’s the point? I’m not going to impress my husband as he knows the truth.) It was quite interesting to discover that…
Recommendations: I am still optimistic about the recommended stocks for holding.
My favorite Q gadgets? I loved the exploding key ring in The Living Daylights, the wrist-activated blowgun of Moonraker, and the fountain pen filled with acid in Octopussy. And my favorite Q moment came in Licence to Kill. In that film, Q actually goes out into the field to assist 007, who has gone rogue. Now, all through Bond's career, Q has constantly complained that Bond never returns his gadgets in their original working condition. Late in the movie, though, Q is posing as a peasant sweeping a sidewalk when the bad guy drives by. Q alerts Bond via the little radio he has attached to the broomstick...and then, with his job done, he casually tosses the broom aside.
Covers are important. They make the difference between someone clicking on your book for download and someone scrolling onto the next title. Looking at artwork for the ebook of The Ravening, for instance, it is too easy to do the traditional zombie cover. I was happy with the original trade cover, but now the look feels overworked. You've seen it: a close up of a dead person's face, usually just the eyes or half the face, and behind it, the shadows of a horde in waiting. Creepy as hell when we first saw the trope emerge in the artwork for Romero's Dawn of the Dead--now just tired.
The last picture here is a Saxon. The only new car my grandparents ever bought. My dad is the boy standing on the running board.
It was like I was watching it happen in slow-motion–a scene that seemed like it was more from a movie than real life. Certainly not my real life. As this blog has already given you a glimpse of, I have seen some pretty weird, and messed up, stuff in my life–especially when it comes to sex. Even I couldn’t fathom this event happening. Ever, A bubble was slowly working its way up to the surface of the water. Where did this bubble come from, you ask? Her butt hole. That’s right: SHE FARTED. IN THE TUB WE WERE SHARING.
The wicked are estranged from the womb;
Everything is just so delicious and I don't remember ever having a bad meal there. At least the food wasn't bad.
“Poor 8 year old Naama Margolese. If my child was spat at, I would wipe the spittle off, gently, wipe away her tears, give her a piece of her favorite chocolate, tell her there are bad men in the world, and in 10 minutes it is over. Waiting three months (what’s that again? The huge outcry was orchestrated three months after it happened? Huh?) to create an overreaction, and having a huge escort to accompany the child to school, and having all sorts of people tracking through her house to visit her as if they’re coming for neechum aveilim… If this poor kid gets traumatized, I’ll tell you why!”You almost have to read it again to make sure your eyes are not playing games with you because it is not fathomable that a person who has spent years studying Torah and connecting to God could ever even think of writing these words, let alone actually writing them and publicizing them.
However when the diaries were finally found it was unclear to everyone, even themselves, who had originally written them.
a shift, a double,
The People’s State Bank in Munising, Michigan
Instead, sit back, and let those perfect minutes count.xx
Sally Hansen HD polish (only one shade - a blue - didn't have a tag in front, but it could be included in the clearance) $3.29
And here, here before My throne
An assortment of tools that could come in handy if only I knew what to use them for!
As the aide, Andrew Young proved an invaluable ally to this pretense. Going so far as to admit to the paternity of the unborn child, his role was to fly this woman, along with his own family, all over the country meeting her demands for first class travel and accommodations. Meanwhile, the candidate himself was touting his “two America’s” crapola all over the airwaves as his “adoring family” stood by basking in his limelight. The donations rolled in and his chances to beat back Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton made him a “contender” for the highest office in the land. It could have happened.
Or, turning it into a Zero Dollar Idea, there could be a totally secret network of moms who offer up their guest rooms for this purpose.
My least favorite character?
He also said that this first submarine, named “KD Tunku Abdul Rahman” was to symbolize historic events and Tunku’s great contributions to the country as “Bapa Kemerdekaan” (Malaysia’s father of independence).
JUICY FRUIT GUM (also yellow...of course!!)
May the LORD make the woman
The presenter at the event, Rich Bronson (a SAPA), walked up to a chair at this point and asked the chair if he could sit in it. He asked the crowd what was weird about it and someone eventually piped up that sitting on it was what the chair was made for. Bronson then pointed out that if, through our language, we say women are made for sex, why would men ask for consent before having sex with them?
This cutie got colored with Copics W9,W7,W5,W3,W1 / E44,E43,E42,E41 / E11,E00, R20 / YR23, E35, YR20 / E49,E35, YR20, E31. I added some Stickles to the flower petals and the ruffles on her shirt for some sparkle. To create sky I like to use my Inkssentials Blending tool (with foam) and sponge on blue ink by SU—easy & quick sky for ya!
IN PRIM'S Magazine! I am thrilled. It came out just a few days ago. One of my FAVORITE dolls is featured in this magazine with my fellow TDIPT girls.
This year at Ecological Gardens we sold our scapes to SpoonRiver restaurant, Chef Shack, Foxy Falafel and Local D’Lish. The scapes were made into pesto, pickled for relishes and tartar sauce and sold fresh. I pickled some of the scapes for our family – seriously bold taste, a little goes a long way, but has now become one of my favorite ways to enjoy scapes. Take your favorite dilly bean pickle recipe and use it on the scapes. I prefer to cut the flower head off, although it is edible. If time is short – you can always grill them with some olive oil and salt!
“O admirable heights and sublime lowliness! O sublime humility! O humble sublimity! That the Lord of the universe, God and the Son of God, so humbles Himself that for our salvation He hides Himself under the little form of bread! Look, brothers, at the humility of God and pour out your hearts before Him! Humble yourselves, as well, that you may be exalted by Him. Therefore, hold back nothing of yourselves for yourselves so that He Who gives Himself totally to you may receive you totally” (Saint Francis, Letter to the Entire Order).
and before I knew it I had signed up to have 3 months of meal plans emailed to me! Hey, 3 months of meals plans for $15; hard to go wrong. On top of that, the premise is that you should be able to assemble a weeks worth of meals (5 suppers) and have them packaged and waiting in the fridge in under an hour. Sounds great, right? Sounds almost too good to be true? Well, after completing my second week of meals - I can say that it's not too good to be true - it's fabulous! The first weeks meal assembly took me 35 minutes to assemble! This weeks meals took 47 minutes and the meals are all happily marinating in the fridge waiting for their day to be cooked.
Right now, we are working on eliminating useless stuff. Being a student, you tend to accumulate lots of paper, books and donation from family members. Right now, our spare bedroom is full of those undesirable items ( Imagine trying to work in your office/guest room with your christmas tree, bulk food items and tons of old textbooks in the way). It makes for a really ugly room that my nieces and nephews don’t really like sleeping in when they visit. In the next apartment, since we have two spare bedrooms, we will try to make beautiful spaces. One will be a guest bedroom and the other our office and tv room. To be able to do this, we have to get rid of a lot of things. Hopefully, we will have a garage space in the yard.
Barry Canning, an incredibly talented singer and songwriter was on stage for the bulk of the night and played some well known covers as well as a few of his own tunes. My own particular favourite of the night was Sweet Caroline, done as well as I've ever heard "my" song sung. Lots of fun, bum bum bum!
This fledgling effort by twenty-something writer Marissa Meyer offers reasonably quick pacing and many not-entirely-expected plot twists, so it kept me interested most of the time.
Or was it a bee that let me be?.
I'll be posting some photos taken last week during the installation process for Landscape Futures: Instruments, Devices and Architectural Inventions, at the Nevada Museum of Art in Reno. The exhibition opens this Saturday, August 13, and will be up until February 12, 2012.
Here's a little list of "pauses" --
When the chutney is cooked, stir in the walnuts and cinnamon.
An agreement that seemed within reach to Obama on Thursday was left on the table Friday by Speaker of the House John Boehner, spurring hours of recriminations over who killed the deal.
Whatever the circumstance or situation, there's a time when the class is quiet.
All of the products I used for this card (except for silver mirror board and embellishments) has been purchased from Crafters Companion. The SWALK image is the iconic image from SWALK and stamped onto Neenah card. The image was coloured in with Spectrum Noir pens. The following pens were used - hair - Natural Oak - 91 (TN8), Mahogany - 96 (TN7), face and skin - Baby Skin Pink - 133 (FS3), Milky White - 132 (FS2), clothes - Pale Baby Blue - 144 (TB2), Pale Blue Light - 185 (TB1), hearts - Rose Pink - 8 (PP5), surround of image - Warm Grey 0.5 ( BG1). The backing paper is from the first SWALK CDROM and printed onto blue paper from the specialised printable paper pack and main card (6"x 6") is made from blue card from specialised pastel card pack. I've also added a blue ribbon and heart diamonte buckle as a finishing touch!! Hope you like it!
pink and zebra print. I'm still painting an antique twin sleigh
I want to like this school but it is hard to like something that tells you that you’re okay because you’re great but you’re not great often enough.
Artificial Intelligence!
Lawton
in the deep straw covering the space
“Well let’s hope she doesn’t spot anymore,” says Kim grimly.
And don't come back for at least a month please, as I still can't get my furry boots on, well on the puffy foot anyway and I feel a bit conspicuous splashing about in odd shoes LOL !!
-Il Forno - Best Italian food I've ever had in my life, everyone at the table agreed.
They would pronounce it fever.
On Saturday night, Lagunitas secured must try status for every one of their beers. I've never had a bad Lagunitas beer and the WTF and Hop Stoopid are excellent values as well as great beers. I foresee many more Lagunitas Saturday nights.
Have you looked at your feet lately? Are they dirty or beautiful?
Imagine a box full of goodies waiting for you when you get off work and trudge home. Imagine how it would change the direction of your day.
A week or so ago, I lauded the Crow Hill Community Association for their successful campaign to bring more trees to Franklin Avenue. Street trees make a huge impact on communities, in ways both obvious and subtle, and it's worth recounting them here:
I still can’t believe that it has been a year since the earthquake happened. I will never forget what happened on March 11th, 2011 and I mourn with the Japanese people over the loss of so many from what happened that day. My heart goes out to all the people affected by this disaster. 日本頑張れ！日本人は強いと思います。
54 if
Great movies, loads of snacks, tons of laughter. What a great evening it turned out to be.
The current leadership includes some princelings, but they are counterbalanced by a rival nonhereditary group that includes President Hu Jintao, also the party chief, and Premier Wen Jiabao. Mr. Hu’s successor, however, is expected to be Xi Jinping, the current vice president, who is the son of a revolutionary hero and would be the first princeling to take the country’s top jobs. Many experts on Chinese politics believe that he has forged an informal alliance with several other princelings who are candidates for promotion.
"This transparent struck easily for me with two strikes. However, it is really easy to overstrike and gets livery (cloudy brown)
Context on the show: Lisa is concerned that the lack of schooling will hurt her chances to get into an Ivy League university, going so far as to note “At this rate I probably won’t even get into Vassar.” Homer is outraged she would even say such a thing and reproaches her with the above.
Right now, there are three major operating systems on the market. Apple with its iOS, Google with Android and the youngest Windows Phone developed by Microsoft. While Apple and Google struggle to be the most popular brand on the the smart-phones market, Microsoft released its OS some time ago and still cannot get even a share equal to Blackberry, which is believed to be either dead or soon to be sold. Why Windows Phone despite its undeniable novelty cannot be even compared to iOS or Android?
Nathaniel sighed. “I suppose so. But they have no motive.”
Esprit Holdings Ltd., a Hong Kong-based clothier that gets about 79 percent of sales from Europe, climbed 5.5 percent after moving to close unprofitable stores in North America. Geely Automobile Holdings Ltd. led Chinese carmakers higher on speculation …
Hello Kiddies!
MC and I rode together, and unfortunately, the ride was malfunctioning. Not too terribly, but the logs kept slowing down and stopping, and a cheery voice would announce that Brer Bear and Brer Fox were causing trouble downstream, and so on. We started to get a little bit nervous, because the logs kept getting closer and closer together, as we neared the crucial "heading up to the falls point". I had a terrible mental image of all the logs creeping up the track to the top, then careening into a pile up at the bottom of the drop. Tick tick tick tick KaSMASHo!
But screenwriting?
After a bit of trouble popping the cork (insert crap joke here...I think I'll go with "we all have that problem from time to time eh lads") , which is perfectly understandably given the age. I carefully pour the rich smelling beer into 5 brandy snifters in which somehow ends up being a 3 man job, and after taking a few photos, we all clink glasses and go nose in for a pleasantly surprising smell, and then to sip the first taste of a 109 year old beer. Amazing, truly amazing. A rich, almost syrupy mouth feel that carries the beers superb and outstandingly still drinkable flavour that's remarkably reminiscent of a very rounded sherry, raisins, honey, a hint of brandy and Dundee marmalade that brings a deeply layered sweetness that balances the foretaste together with the subtle, but noticeably there aftertaste of a marmity saltiness that's less full on then it was in the Thomas Hardy Ale I tried, but was more embodied and layered in to the flavour of the beer.
And he did. I ate it with relish and lots of onions. (Sorry all our vegan and vegetarian friends!) I bought him one too. We had a great date.
And mind-fucks and self-doubt
My life is controlled by love, just as Christ Jesus loved me and gave His life for me as a sweet-smelling offering and sacrifice that pleases God! Amen!
A. I find my frustration and relative short temper something that I just don’t know how I will ever overcome. How will I ever love Naomi the right way, God’s way. An example is when I’m driving and Naomi is in the car, I just get so frustrated with her comments on my driving, or with her silence! I bring this to God, and think I should bring it to Him even more. I believe He can change me, and He wants to change me.
Welcome back to another NEW CHALLENGE at STAMP-N-DOODLE!! Great entries last week and we really want to thank everyone who played along for yet again stunning us with your fabulous work. Our winner this week as chosen by random.org is:
Whisper flew to land
Notes for Editors
1 small red or green jalapeno, halved lengthwise,
You’ve got to realize we’re dealing in a world where they use assassination like most of us use tissue papers.
The group finally admits to each other that they were all being selfish. Even Jintan admits he was kind of happy that he was the only one able to see Menma. Unlike the others though, he wanted to grant Menma’s wish because Menma herself wanted it, not him for some selfish reason. The whole scene seemed to put the trust back in the group and they start calling each other by their old nicknames. Yukiatsu embracing Jintan with one arm and calling him ‘leader’, has to be one of his more bad-ass moments.
Of a purse well filled, and a heart well tried -
Did you know that the company that makes Mega Blocks also puts out the Rose Art line and a brand of pens called "The Write Dudes"? I did not. These bright, shiny pens are sure to be a hit with the same boy who makes the Post-it animations. Though he also does this thing where he turns pens into mini-cross bows, so no one can really predict whether he will actually use these to write.
It wasn’t long into the vows when the Pregnant Friend I Stole Food Off began to tear up. This was remarkable when you consider she couldn’t actually see anything from where we were seated, and I was quietly narrating the events as they happened for her. I like to imagine it was because I gave such a beautiful, moving account, but let’s be honest hormones probably played a much bigger role.
Sanitarium general manager Pierre van Heerden said hopefully enough stock was in circulation to last a few weeks, but production wasn't expected to resume until midway through this year.
Tom: Like plums mixed with…
Damn it!
Dave’s perfect wife would eagerly anticipate the next shared hike together, certain she could conquer the ragged terrain of any mountain. This someone would engage in political debates, enjoy running in marathons, and read Time magazine.
People are so CRAZY
The statement said the pilot was receiving treatment at the Nigerian Air Force Aero Medical Hospital, Kaduna. No fatality was reported on the ground.
So was Stevie. Real potential. Shame the way it happened to him.
Hello to all my friends! Welcome to all the new people who are following me now. I am delighted to have each and every one of you here to look at what I do.
I see. What seems to be the problem?
I struggle with depression.
Remember it was Paul who said that they would all be CHANGED, in the twinkling of an eye. The CHANGING is the same as the transformation. They are CHANGED from dust to spirit. The basic meaning of the English word “transform” is to change into something else. The same is true of the Greek word here used. The idea is to change into something else. Resurrection is what facilitates the change. The body dies and decays. The soul is resurrected and given a new body. That’s how they change, that’s how they transform.
Leave the cake to cool slightly in the mould/tin before turning out onto a wire cooling rack to cool completely.
A hint of the wit is showcased by Chetan as soon as one opens the book, when he dedicates the book to his in-laws and at the same instant visualises it as being henpecked under the thumb of his wife, or not being a man enough. Not only humour, but a cause is also highlighted, as the author in the book itself states, “I want to be a writer” and defines it as “someone who tells stories that are fun but bring about change too”, that is the message of “One India”, a country without the demarcation of states and communities. Towards the end, it also plays an emotional tune when the alienated father-son relation melts down to a normal one.
This American Life factchecked Daisey's piece, as I said. They asked for his translator's contact info. Daisey said it was no longer valid, and besides, he changed the translator's name for the piece. The radio show took him at his word (other things checked out) and ran the piece.
"Well, come on," said Will, opening the circular door in the tree. "No use dallying out here."
the quiet Archeologist
Not seeing Logan in traction on a gourney did wonders for my state of mind.
BEIJING — The US Embassy in China is promising to streamline visa requests and hire more people to process applicants as part of President Barack Obama’s push to boost tourism to the United States. The embassy said in a statement Thursday that it will …
Crystal stemware, bowls, platters, and various other items have illuminated dinner parties and formal occasions for centuries. At one time crystal stemware adorned only the tables of the super-wealthy, but over the past century the crystal marketplace has produced items that can be used by anyone who desires a beautiful table setting.
Fooly Cooly is about a boy named Naota Nandaba, who is in a complex relationship with a high schooler, Mamimi Samejima, and a guitar-playing, Vespa-riding, alien-type pinkhead called Haruko Haruhara. This story is extremely wacky, obscene, and tasteless. Please enjoy.
“How do you know I don’t know him if you don’t tell me who he is?”
Home-grown, freshly picked asparagus bears little, if any resemblance to those bought in stores. Whilst outwardly they look the same, the good sugars in the store-bought versions have mostly turned to starch by the time they hit the shelves (this is also true of bamboo shoots and sweetcorn). So eating freshly picked spears is a dining experience that words can’t describe, nor money buy.
Today, this nation is listening to candidates about conservative ideas which are in reality not reflected by the vast majority of Americans. Their political, social, religious, and economic views and comments are appealing to a minority of Americans who possess those views. The fact that the politicians are playing on the fears of the vulnerable by addressing each political view as if it were a litany of epistles is misleading, dishonest, and typically political. A term which gets too much attention is “I am a true Conservative”. What is a true conservative? I am not sure anyone has met one. The 2012 candidates for president are using the term conservative as if it were the holy grail. It is a political position that changes depending on the “winds of the electorate”. Of course, there are those conservatives who are extreme in their beliefs and expect the nation to follow strict interpretations of all laws and traditional ideologies no matter the cost to individual liberties.
Scotty’s Brewhouse Muncie is now pouring Rivertown Unit 6 Hefeweizen! Come by and enjoy a 48oz Pitcher of this refreshing beer every Tuesday for only $5!!
The Government are currently shafting us from behind regarding pay and pensions and now the judiciary are shafting us and consigning us to a job where you are being constantly abused with impunity all day. The risk is that one day the police will stop giving a damn too and watch the anarchy that then follows. Sign the petition here.
Later, they transported us over to the Gatwick Hilton. We were given free evening meals and drinks. The people who needed supplies for babies, the people who had left their shoes on the plane, and the people who needed other necessities quickly had them provided by Virgin staff who had run over to Tesco and bought it all.
My entry this week, of course, is Caden. I literally just teared up looking at this picture, thinking about my boy's special beautiful heart and the miracle of who he is. In case you're popping in from I Heart Faces and don't know the whole story, Caden was born with severe heart defects and had open heart surgery at 5 days old. The three weeks he spent in the cicu at Choa Egleston were the scariest and most beautiful ones I have ever faced. God met us, and encouraged and uplifted us, in incredible ways, even as we surrendered our son.
In snooping around the net (aka doing my research) to find out more about her, I found some of her singing, which strikes me as ok but not earth shaking (the ESL is definitely a factor), and pictures of her... And wow, what a disappointment those were.
Hello! I am Roberta from Prairie Fairy Designs. I am a digital stamp company featuring artwork not only created by me but also my two kids, ages 9 and 12. They are featured on the site as the Fairy Princess and the Prairie Prince. I have been an artist for as long as I can remember and have always loved to create. Two years ago my sister-in-law invited me to a rubber stamp party. I laughed and said "Maybe I will buy something if I can use it to stamp on canvases.". Needless to say, I was hooked! Two years later, a lot of learning about computers, and a few setbacks with web stuff (I am so not tech savvy!) I finally accomplished my goal. We have been around since the spring and still growing. If you have any questions about going digital, check out the site and the Prairie Fairy blog for more information, tips and tutorials. So head on over to Prairie Fairy Designs and check it out!
As the the Doctor had earlier predicted, the Mandragora Helix re-appeared in 1990s London, this time exploiting the use of an illegal drug called Mandrake (another name for Mandragora). The Doctor and Ace, with the help of UNIT and Captain Muriel Frost, in particular put a stop to it.
but after 3 different colours....it still wasn't right so I pop in to Mr H's shed (yes he works in a shed too!) to have a little moan........and spot this little guy :) .......then I remember the fab photo above in MM 's first issue and I'm in the car on the way to the diy store before you can say 'thunderbirds are go!'
Despite their rural location, and subsistence living conditions, fashion is never far off the agenda. The girls, in 36 degree heat, are almost without exception kitted out in long sleeved polo neck jumpers and jeans, their heads and necks swathed in a motley collection of scarves and hats. This is to keep the sun off their bodies in the constant Asian ambition to have the whitest skin possible. The boys often sport funky hairdos and skinny jeans.Their shirts may be torn and grubby, but more often than you'd expect for a Cambodian farmer, they'll feature some applique sequins or twinkly rhinestones. I never cease to be amazed at the end of the month, seeing our deminers changing out of their sober uniforms and emerging as a bunch of youthful skinny peacocks as they head off on leave.
4 comes
“I did call you a lout, you are a lout and it is a word. Only louts don’t know what a lout is!”
When I watched the excerpts of the Dalai Lama’s visit, one audience member asked what could have been considered a controversial question about being an oppressed people in what is basically an occupied land surrounded by ones oppressors. Now, the Dalai Lama is uniquely qualified to speak on that exact same issue, having been through a hostile Chinese occupation, a near genocide, and the subsequent Han-ification of his native Tibet. He gave sagely advice about keeping ones cultural identity in the face of adversity, and was glad he had answered with such wisdom and compassion, but I was saddened that there could be people on these Islands who might think of me as part of an invading force, just one more Haole face in an ocean that only brings more and more of us with each tide, and that there are people on the Island who view modernization and infrastructure improvements as the destruction of their old ways only to make room for even more invading haoles, and so, are against modernization on principle.
The First Dude and his wife have some wounds that need lick’n.
that two and a half years later
Well for a start you must understand that our ruling party are voted into power by a largely moronic plebiscite. I choose the word moronic intentionally. If the cut off point for moronic is an I.Q. of 70, half the voting population would be classified as such.
I hadn’t even noticed that this tiny elegant object was itself in the form of a teapot, sort of a sterling silver fractal.
Jesus tells us to Believe in our prayers but Jesus adds a post-script. He says if you are holding anything against anyone, if we are holding anger, resentment, bitterness, fear, worry, the desire to dominate, guilt, sexual impurity, jealousy, inferiorities, or lack of love, then, we must forgive; first!
4. CHANEL Allure Sport-When Allure is in motion, it reveals an instinctive body language and becomes naturally seductive. Both power and grace are revealed, through an energy that demonstrates sensuality. All it needed was a new interpretation, Allure Homme Sport.
Alot going on at my house. I'm not ready to blog about it. Please pray for us. God is really poreing out His love. We are definatly going through a valley. God is good, He is here with us.
In her continuous attention to men and women living in society, the Church has accumulated a rich doctrinal heritage. This has its roots in Sacred Scripture, especially the Gospels and the apostolic writings, and takes on shape and body beginning from the Fathers of the Church and the great Doctors of the Middle Ages, constituting a doctrine in which, even without explicit and direct Magisterial pronouncements, the Church gradually came to recognize her competence.
Scarlet Ribbons (For Her Hair)
Cantor: Obama hates Catholics and
Dinosaur Hand: Woo woo wooooo. Indiana rules.
when a Christian was sentenced to be killed in some terrible way, they literally thanked their executioners.
Down the road that I must travel
Sessions must take place by 5PM EST on March 31, 2012.
I just can’t believe how long I’ve let you string me along.
Mr. WNM is presumed dead. That's bad news for Federal agent Gina Russo whom he holds responsible for his brother's lifetime incarceration. He plots down to the last letter containing THE FINAL CLUE to get his revenge.
Never look to the opposite side to change. It is always your turn to change. Society begins and ends with each of us. If you want to reverse some frustrating polarization of thought you encounter in others, I invite you to passionately doubt everything you believe.
07 - Bishop Danced
The manipulation technique at the focus of this safety study was defined as the application of high-velocity/low-amplitude or mechanically assisted thrust to the cervical spine. Patients were followed, and any adverse symptoms recorded immediately, and up to seven days after treatment.
Will peered over his shoulder at her. "No, you're just going to stand out here and Xenith'll come to you." He cackled. "Relax. You're not gonna die."
The album was produced by Head, who recorded the music off and on for the past two years in Phoenix, Arizona. It features renowned musicians Tony Levin (Peter Gabriel, David Bowie) and Josh Freese (A Perfect Circle, Nine Inch Nails), and was mixed by Ralph Patlan and Bob Clearmountain. It’s a testimony of Head’s life as he battled with drug addiction and leaving Korn, and finding spirituality. It will leave no doubt in everyone’s mind that Head, as a founding member of Korn, has not lost his passion for the heavy sound that originally helped make his former band famous. SAVE ME FROM MYSELF will remind listeners of Head’s dominant influence in the nu-metal sound that projected Korn to the top of the music charts for over a decade. It can only be described as a heavy metal epic, with a positive message.
My senior year at Miami Norland High School was when I first got interested in creative writing. Mrs. Massey taught a journalism class that seemed to cover everything but journalism. Inspired by the ground-breaking social upheaval of the times, she didn’t take attendance and she didn’t mind taking guff from her precocious students, most of whom were Jewish, upper-middle-class and looking for intellectual trouble.
Kids React to Bullying (Series)
“You can always find time to write. Anybody who says he can’t is living under false pretenses. To that extent depend on inspiration. Don’t wait. When you have an inspiration put it down. Don’t wait until later and when you have more time and then try to recapture the mood and add flourishes. You can never recapture the mood with the vividness of its first impression.”
Japanese artists sang a tune of the sad song of devastation, and messages of sorrow lined with hope were spoken.
It’s baaack!
2:28 pm. “Try stranding kidsilk haze into your next pair of socks.” That sounds yummy. I must remember to try this.
Unbearable pain. . . . .
Getting the online Master's degree is really a personal investment for any advancement and changes that any one is planning for the career being pursued. The many available online degrees has really been a great opportunity offer for those who really want to have the educational achievement without having to put all other responsibilities on hold. It also eliminates the transfer and relocation needs that any normal student may sometimes need to consider. Even transporting and spending all the daytime hours in the campus is not a requirement for an enrolled person in the online degrees available for Master's and even Bachelor's degrees.
It's Mother's Day 2012! I'm happily recovering at home from the National Genealogical Society Conference that was held in Cincinnati this year. I stayed in a downtown hotel with my cousin, Barbara Pharo, and had the opportunity to meet several of the bloggers I follow in person. It was a great week!
Oh my, first I need to apologize for not updating in a while~ I have been so distracted lately and been focusing on everything else but this blog. I also get so overwhelmed with the amount of pictures that are saved in my cellie or tablet right now. I am not sure when or if I will be posting them. But I just figured out my PB password and now I have no excuse not to start uploading them. So hopefully I will be showing my blog some love from now on.
Raymond V. Raehn agrees with Lind that “Political Correctness is Marxism, with all that implies: loss of freedom of expression, thought control, inversion of the traditional social order and, ultimately, a totalitarian state.” According to him, “Gramsci envisioned a long march through the society’s institutions, including the government, the judiciary, the military, the schools and the media.” “He also concluded that so long as the workers had a Christian soul, they would not respond to revolutionary appeals.” Another one of the early cultural Marxists, Georg Lukacs, noted that “Such a worldwide overturning of values cannot take place without the annihilation of the old values and the creation of new ones by the revolutionaries.” At a meeting in Germany in 1923, “Lukacs proposed the concept of inducing “Cultural Pessimism” in order to increase the state of hopelessness and alienation in the people of the West as a necessary prerequisite for revolution.”
With the 'Smallville: The Complete Series' DVD, fans will be able to relive all of Clark Kent's romantic encounters, from start to finish! With an Exclusive Daily Planet newspaper written by DC Comics that highlights the important storylines developed during the 10-year run of the show, the Smallville Complete Series is a must-have for all Smallville fans! * http://amzn.to/if4Uxa * Includes 62 discs, never before seen production art and behind the scenes photos from the set!
#15 - Kid Stuff
Hugs from Wendy, Jane & DT xx
Networks are big businesses. At a basic level, they profit when they can entertain the most number of viewers, so they’re looking for mass appeal. I didn’t notice before my project that each network seems to specialize in different types of shows. For example, ABC contains mostly sexy dramas and family sitcoms while CBS specializes in police procedurals. NBC is mostly successful with a series of quirky sitcoms. To have so many similar type shows, the networks are clearly trying to hook specific audiences. Is there a correlation between the nearly soap-opera style dramas of ABC like “Grey’s Anatomy” and “Once Upon a Time” that lends itself to homosexual relationships over crime mysteries like the CSI’s and NCIS’s or off-beathumor comedies like “Parks and Recreation” and “30 Rock”? The assumption might be the stereotype that homosexuals are defined by their sexuality: therefore it makes sense to include them in shows that rely on selling themselves through a sexy image. But does a romantic preference for your own sex mean that you’re worse at solving crimes or being funny? Of course not—that’s not even a specific stereotype. But then why wouldn’t the networks make the sexuality of their characters more fairly distributed? I do suspect that the networks are working with their audience’s expectations and comfort levels in a specific ways. In his article “Television as Gathering Place,” Paul Adams discusses television, our country’s favorite pastime which consumes an average of 6 hours of the life of the daily American, as a location. Even though it is physically impossible to go to the worlds that different television shows create, Adams argues that people feel an attachment to the characters they get to know in shows that matters in a way that is effectively real on an emotional level (Adams). The comparison that comes to mind is video game addictions: people actually become invested in winning whatever point system the games set up, despite the fact that the points hold no value in the real world. The value is all personal to the player, or in this case, the watcher. Following this line of thought, audiences who are predisposed to feeling more or less comfortable with queer sexuality may be targeted depending on the network expectations. Perhaps it’s something about the kind of people who watch quirky sitcoms or crime shows that networks believe are less likely to feel empathetic toward queer sexuality. Or, more likely, it’s easier for an ignorant tongue to palette in a realm that’s already constituted as sexual, such as on ABC. I say ignorant because it seems clear to me that, as big corporations, the networks would include more queer characters if they felt there was a real desire for them. Not including them is an assumption that they are unwanted, unprofitable.
My psycho neighbor is at it again...
Product Marketing Manager of Fiber Optic Test Equipment. I have founded and sold a fiber optic distributorship, Project Managed Fiber Optic Networks and Distributed Antenna Systems installations for campuses, cities and stadiums. I have managed $24M sales territories and exceeded sales plans. I am a competitive person. I founded and play for the Lady Monarch Ice Hockey team who were National Runners up in 2011 and compete in Sprint and Olympic Triathlons. I am Audi Club Driving instructor.
I decided to just run through quests with none of the in-character feelings I usually have (because it had been so long since last playing, I didn’t remember most of the stuff I had done).
So, since everyone else is doing it, I thought I would do the fun little survey going around...
All of these supplies cost me somewhere in the neighborhood of $35-40 - including the $20 book.
So if it’s not for power and easy money, then what is it for?
to love someone … you have to give
But how far back does virtual reality go?
Label: Chic
to extinction?
Fiery Furnaces - Blueberry Boat - 2004
No pictures today.
So I started looking online at places that I could find some maternity swimsuits. They seemed so expensive and I don't like spending money on swimsuits anywho. But they cheapest ones I was finding were around $50.00. To much for this girl, and they may have been some for around $40, but they were online only and then you had to pay shipping, so still $50 bucks! I liked some at Motherhood online, (and I just now saw they are on sale, some for $30, dang it!) I also saw some at Target, and I even tried some on...that's when it got really scary! So I said, 'No, not now.'
7- Work for peace and you will be called children of God. I must live at peace with others as well as help others live at peace with each other. I need to be a peace maker and doer in all areas of my life. (even at home)
Read all four pages of correspondence related to this 1943 cane request. Materials were reproduced from FDR’s President’s Personal File (PPF) 50-d: Congratulations, 1943.
I did manually introduce some separation, by using a mixing method I detail below, and a little of mda_image. I feel the end justified the means as the clarity this brought means that each instrument can be heard.
In a funhouse at a closed pier are Carl Kozoff, a diamond fence, a couple crooks including Salos (Dewey Robinson) and Carl’s twin brother Kurt. They don’t trust him. They shouldn’t. He goes out and calls Charlie and tells him to meet him at the pier.
about little kids who don't have houses to sleep in.
Some were left unwashed or in soiled clothes, while others were forgotten after being sent home or given the wrong medication.
dress Sonia Rykiel for H&M
W2: That's nice. Hmm. Maybe we should plan some Japanese food for the lunchroom on Multicultural Day.
Pretty sure I'm being Officer Obvious when I say it's a struggle to get one's mind around social media efforts, to create the ideal balance between online activities and the actual writing of books.
And it is understandable that there is unease amoungst the indigenous population. They are not stupid. They have seen what happens once the maggot of Islam embeds itself firmly body of an host community. The Community, sickens and eventually flees or dies.
The meeting was about the civil rights movement. Things were happening. The first black student had been admitted to the university (after a court case) in 1954, but there were still only a few black students by 1960. Martin Luther King was speaking, arguments raging, and people were getting hurt.
My left thigh, eye, and arm quiver again and again. My heart palpitates fearsomely. These are signs of ill fortune.
Whenever in doubt over outfit coordination, you can always rely on a statement dress to do all the talking for you. Sit back and let a bold colour or print dress take the limelight, and work a few little accessories around it. It's the perfect way to achieve maximum impact with minimal effort! :D
At an Orania guesthouse the next day, I meet a retired couple from Nelspruit. They sit on the front porch, sip tea, and watch the sun set. She, with hair shaped into a black helmet and eyes magnified behind thick glass, tells me: “Our children think we are mad coming here, but we have to find a safe place to live. The crime in Nelspruit is terrible, and getting worse. Four times they broke into our home. We have to chain our car to a tree so it won’t get dragged away. I can’t sleep anymore. The smallest noise, and I wake up; have to go check. Our friends have been killed; women we know raped...” Her voice grows with hysteria; eyes wide with remembered fear. “It’s just terrible, terrible. Always locking doors, locking windows. We’re like prisoners in our own home. No one should have to live like this. I’m going mad, quite simply mad with fear.” Her husband tries to calm her. She takes a deep breath and strokes nonexistent wrinkles on her dress.
Trace location through gps software has become very common. With so many people using it, many of them started misusing it. So many people want to find out how much your spouse is loyal to them and it is their children under bad influence or adopted any bad habit. help you control cell, allowing you come across with the details of any cell phone that you want to track.Tracking cell phones is the need of the day. Because of the independence demanded by and offered to the kids today, it is obvious that someday their confidence will change into overconfidence and this will force them to think that whatever they want is right and they can practically make anything possible. This thinking is good when it works for the benefit for the person under question, but generally this overconfidence does not lead towards the right path. Thus, tracking becomes necessary to find out the truth.
I do see a brighter side. As soon as the black cloud drifts away to hang over someone else, I may have a renewal in my writing spirit.
It’s the communion of a soul nursed to life by the flesh and blood of God Everlasting.
The tragedy is not simply that Mugabe has destroyed his own country. He has exported the cancer. He’s poisoned the well. He’s contaminated the politics of the region, especially SA. Our politicians have learnt from the master’s knee, so to speak — the buck- passing (blame everything on imperialists and apartheid); the reckless and incendiary language; the refusal to see reason or deal with reality even as it stares you in the face. It was, I suppose, appropriate that Malema should pay homage in person to Mugabe.
We are enjoying an early Easter cocktail today. Chad has been working in his mixology lab, re-creating our favorite treats found in our Easter baskets.
The plan for today was to get up and go, all the way down, and before it gets dark. There were too many people taking too long showers, so we barely made it to the Yavapai cafeteria by 8AM or something. It was a nice crisp cold sunny morning. Perfect weather. After some hearty backpacking breakfast (oatmeal, pancakes, and coffee) we went on figuring out how to organize the carpool. It turned out that the only place the cars could be left at was next to the backcountry office. I was fine with that. Rienk, on the other hand, was afraid that the cars there could be broken into. I didn’t really want to argue with this case of paranoia so we left the cars ‘parked’ next to the Yavapai lodge.
For example, that is the only reason why his Justice Department is challenging the Arizona immigration law.The law allows police to check the immigration status of someone stopped for other reasons. Verrilli claimed that constitutes an intrusion on the federal monopoly on immigration enforcement. He was pummeled. Why shouldn’t a state help the federal government enforce the law? “You can see it’s not selling very well,” said Justice Sonia Sotomayor.
A frequent visitor to our gardens are the native 'blue banded' bees. They are slightly bigger and fatter than a honeybee. These bees are attracted to blue flowers. The flower featured here is a hedgehog sage.
Narrowing itself into inevitability,
I walked further down the yard into the sunshine.
Beer D: Andechser Bergbock Hell
A plug in fragrance diffuser with an apple pie scent...mmmmm! and,
total: $88
Combine the zest, juice, sugar and chopped butter in a 1L microwaveable bowl (lid required). Add 2 eggs to this mixture and whisk together. Cover and microwave and high (800 watts) for 3 minutes, whisking every minute. Chill to thicken; roughly 2 - 3 hours. Once lemon curd has thickened completely, you can begin to assemble the filled friands. Take a friand, cut it in half (horizontially) and spread a thick layer of lemon curd on one of the insides of the friand. Sprinkle flaked almonds on top of this lemon curd layer. Replace the top of the friand over this filling. Continue until all friands are filled.
The ninth day…in my 12 days of Thanksgiving…so what’s the list look like so far?
she really wasn’t!
This time last year, I wrote about three drinks that meld booze and eggs; Elise Hannemann’s 1904 eierpunsch, William Verpoorten’s modern-day eierlikör, and — from the pages of Playboy magazine — Jeffrey Morgenthaler’s eggnog.
“Parents?” She looked confused for a moment. “Oh, no parents. I actually live with my aunt."
Rolling Rock that is; wow what a nice crisp and light tasting beer. I suppose it has something to do with the fact it is an ‘extra pale’ lager. I like that green bottle, simple understated label etched right on the glass.
Leotights (yes i´m wearing tights:):Palmers
Thank GOD for growth.
But when Mr. Paul dropped out of the national race in June 2008, Mr. Witt did not stop, because, in a sense, neither did Mr. Paul: Mr. Witt and many other supporters here joined the Iowa branch of an independent political group Mr. Paul established after the race. They carried on his libertarian message, and picked local organizers. And when Mr. Paul announced that he was running for president this year, Mr. Witt and others jumped back onto his campaign, a force more motivated and efficient than before.
“My nerves are bad to-night. Yes, bad. Stay with me.
"The pendant above the table is the first light I ever bought. It shocked us how much pendant drum shades are. To save some money we bought the pieces to make this pendant from two different shops on Etsy. We ordered an 18 inch wide, 9 inch tall drum shade for $70 and a three light pendant fixture for $110. Unfortunately, both the shops that made these are no longer in business.
Gloria, Apostelnstrasse 11, 50667 Köln 2012-03-15
Anyway, I am sure that one day soon, I will be baking for real again. I have a stack of baking books ready to go.
Disc Three (2002): “After the War”
It’s this simple, the bill comes in and I pay it, what’s wrong with this picture ?
Next I will be working on two different variations of Byzantine and some quite adorable little Christmas Trees.
the may schedule had originally included 3 nyrr races, but a conflict has cut that number down to just two: the japan day 4 miler and the brooklyn half marathon. i had registered for the healthy kidney 10k, but my nephew's first communion is on that day - so i'll be in church, not central park, that morning.
Kasper Unfortunately a former secretary from this office, Sanne, had a key, and she was using the flat for a liason with her lover, the billionaire energy magnate Tobias Gram.
In summation, I would say that I have had better and they can be hit and miss. So, I can totally understand the trading games that happen in the field. On the flip side, I have eaten much worse.
4. i am use to having a table to myself when i design so i get a little anxiety having to share in such close quarters with others
I was able to run by the LHBS to pick up supplies for my brew session, but alas, it was not to be. The busyness of the weekend got in the way - better luck next weekend! And, as I was afraid of, my LHBS was out of the hops that I wanted - Northern Brewer. In fact, he was out of quite a bit of hops. He did have the Willamette hops that I wanted to try, and instead of the Northern Brewer I'm going to try Perle as my bittering hop. He was also out of Crystal 60L, so I had to settle for Crystal 40L. I'm sure I won't notice the difference! Anyway, my "Clean out the Pantry Ale" will look something like this:
It's my turn, once again, to bring you some inspiration from the Card A Day Blog. Hello friends and welcome newcomers to my little creative space. This week's theme at CADB is 'Congratulations.' We have a graduation coming up before too long, so I decided to use that as my inspiration for this card. I didn't have to think about what colors to use because the school colors are purple and gold...one item taken care of; just needed to find the papers.
The holiday celebrations continued... My sister-in-law J. and I hosted a cookie exchange on Sunday. We invited a bunch of girls--a combination of friends and family--and everyone brought about 3 dozen cookies to swap. During the party, we sampled some of the treats and each girl went home with a platter full of cookies, a few of each kind.
2. Use a tripod. You knew that, didn’t you? This’ll keep everything sharp – except for everything that’s moving, of course. I like to use a Nikon MC-DC2 Remote Release Cord to further minimize camera shake, which can be introduced if you are touching the shutter button on your camera.
There are days when I truly believe I work in The Office. Yes, like the T.V. show.
An entertaining moment was when we were by a lake. A group of schoolchildren were just leaving as we arrived. They were adorable, but that isn't the entertaining bit. Someone was watering the shrubs from a hosepipe, and after a while he realised that no more water was coming out. Another man carefully unkinked the hose, but it didn't help.
One last gesture of anger from the broken protest: two men start chanting “We all live in a fascist regime,” but it doesn’t catch.
After only two weeks of games, Gus has put its flag in the sand and stoically proclaimed both the best and worst team in the nation. Our first rankings of the season can be found here.
For all these projects, the idea itself was just a start point. Thanks to their own hard work and the support of the team of experienced mentors, who gave up their weekends to help, projects had really progressed by Sunday evening and the final presentations were incredibly professional and well constructed.
Me: OK, I have to go home.
I am sat at home tidying up, packing and looking for a stray data cable. It’s surprising what you find when you start packing and or looking for something. I have found things I had totally forgotten about, but not the all important data cable, which I need in 10 days time.
I wrote a blog a week ago that covered Harvey Goldsmith’s view of the Top 10 greatest entrepreneurs past and present (part 1). Here is the final listing from 6 – 10 and the insights I think are important for other ambitious people:
Are there things that theatres or development organizations could do to make themselves more accessible to writers who are also parents? Should they?
And wash away
Edit 10: $44,000!!!!!!!!! REDDIT!!!!! I can hardly breathe. I refreshed the page at least twice to make sure it was real. I cannot believe this. I just came back from the orphanage..... Let's just say many tears were shed, and many hugs were shared. The children were all leaving to school as I arrived, but I will return around 6pm to take a group picture. I am about to upload the picture and video of Omari's thanks. He's been reading all of your comments, he said he'll read every one if it takes him all day. $44,000. Reddit, thank you.
I know my hope and faith in God will soften the hearts of my two boys and they will realize that no matter what happened in the past, it doesn’t have to set the course for our future.
I finished the first draft a few days before I had to return home to Ireland. There was this awful anti-climax. I don’t know if I had expected the heavens to part, or Mexican trumpets, or what, but I remember feeling empty, deflated (and generally unbearable to be around).
But you could get fancy and whip something up.
For people experiencing ‘awakening’ or spontaneous evolution, the influx of this mains energy (often referred to as ‘Light’) increases dramatically.
ONION SARAZA
The world of subtle forms of life is even more mysterious. Creatures invisible to the human eye fly in air or swim in water. They pervade the very dust of earth and are also present as bacteria, viruses etc in the body. The analysis of these bacteria etc are dragging scientific research in various directions. Anatomists, doctors etc all over the world are at a loss while trying to find ways of overcoming this ‘army’ of brave germs? The culprit that induces malaria i.e. the mosquito remains invincible despite devouring large amounts of DDT. Thus the question asked is how far will we succeed in vanquishing other smaller germs like bacteria, viruses etc in totality that are causes of grave diseases like AIDS, bird flu etc? We can somehow find a way to defeat an army which welds weapons. But it is a totally different story when it comes to finding ways of overpowering a plethora of deadly germs which changes in form like the skin color of a chameleon. These subtle life forms have their own world. Even if one of them is given the capacity to depict the history of their species and its way of living man will humbly realize that in comparison to their (bacteria etc) world his own world is tiny and less advanced in a certain sense.
Once children are ready to walk as toddlers, their need for properly-fitted shoes is important. In general, a soft, pliable, roomy shoe, such as a sneaker, is ideal for all children. The toe box should provide enough space for growth and should be wide enough to allow the toes to wiggle. A finger’s breadth of extra length will usually allow for about three to six months’ worth of growth, though this can vary depending on your child’s age and rate of growth.
But it is going to start doing so now, under Obama and the Democrats in Congress. They could care less about the Constitution, or about the consequences of radically expanding already massive government bureaucracies.
The worst drought in recorded history has left the small rural town of Havensburg, Kentucky in isolation and despair. Reserves are drying up, local officials have failed to enforce water-rationing regulations, and the relentless heat is causing panic and unrest among the town’s citizens.
Unlike his predecessors, Campbell knows where to put his camera for maximum effect. A camera isn’t just placed HERE because it allows us to see everything important in this scene, but because this is the best place to give that next scene its biggest possible impact. I don’t mean to suggest that Campbell is channeling Sam Raimi’s Quick and the Dead style, either. There’s a term used to describe some players in baseball – “professional hitter.” The term means you’re not a superstar but you’re going to do what you’re supposed to based on the pitch and the situation. You’re not going to try to pull the outside pitch with a runner on first because that’s going to lead to a double play. You might do that with 2 strikes on you and a runner on 2nd or 3rd with less than 2 outs because that’s going to advance the runner.
You can use any line of three ...You have the whole month of May to play along..
You protest when it's proven true:
Political commentator Peter Lavelle says the chairman's statement puts him beyond real journalism.
A lesser confident person would have caved to all of the comments, but I try to blow them off and move on. Really, I’m not any more pale, tired, etc. than anyone else but for some reason, their worry translates into obsessing about my appearance.
Despite doctors from NRS Medical Hospital having confirmed that stones had been inserted into her vagina and rectum, Soni Sori has received no proper medical attention.We fear for Soni’s life and are outraged and ashamed at this inhuman treatment of a woman in India.
Inner City Big fun US
Also, you can bet I'm going to be reporting more abuse of these spots, now that I really understand how important they are to families like ours. If you have a phone that runs apps - there is an app for that! Parking Mobility - you can report offenders of disabled parking spaces. I'm not sure if it actually works, but it makes me feel better. Also, a note doesn't hurt. Also, if you park in one of these spaces, and have a placard, it also means that the disabled person MUST enter or exit the vehicle (at least in my state). This means Grandma (with the placard) can't sit in the car while you run in to the store. I know you're just "running in" but sometimes these spots fill up all at once. Everyone and their brother has one of these placards (they are all confirmed by doctors, I'm sure), but I'm just saying - these are in demand spots! And it's not always just a "nice to have." but not necessary.
There is much that I appreciated about the printed curriculum, most especially the worldview that it is written from. I love that it is non-consumable and the student only needs a notebook for journaling in, and access to reference books like a thesauruas and dictionary. The work includes some grammar and vocabulary tasks, but is designed mainly to help students to learn to communicate their beliefs skillfully and effectively.
Colouring Medium: Copic Markers
-North China Jiaotong University
Adam Smith – The Wealth of Nations (1776)
With tremendous love for cricket stats that are passionate never get tired of talking and discussing cricket everywhere no matter where they can discuss and find a cricket fanatic and have two pricing options. The first option is to catch-up with the cricket ashes dates. If their favorite game of thrills and actions of the cricket ashes series and hind wings that are involved in cricket. Indian team is that you just need to choose from the english cricket ashes of their favorite cricket players. Cricket fan approaches to various sources from where they have a cricket site that provides cricket podcasts are the headingley cricket ashes and the cricket ashes tour for getting desired cricket wallpaper. There fans can know all about the cricket ashes dates a particular series. Moreover, listening of cricket dedicated websites. Most of these online cricket thrills to cricket matches that have been played and these matches have made cricket a much loved game and cricket fans, it comes as a benefit when they can become addicted to it. You need to broaden their knowledge about the edgbaston cricket ashes past tense indicates that the cricket ashes series from the headingley cricket ashes that gets created when some cricket match is about to start. For instance, a tournament is biggest event of cricket forum is very popular and hugely viewed game. People are crazy and very passionate about cricket or cricket personalities fearlessly. You can admire performances of players. Winner is declared on actual performance on the headingley cricket ashes a tournament takes place, fans always find some or the cricket ashes 2005 of applications you can simply download the headingley cricket ashes. Almost every cricket lover wants to tell what they do not damage fabric or paper products unlike house crickets. Cave crickets usually reside in wells, hollow tress, under damp leaves/stones/logs/boards. They generally wander into houses by mistake and are covered with hand-stitched leather quarters. Cricket history also informs about the headingley cricket ashes into cricket is one such platform where every individual wants to participate in the headingley cricket ashes it originated.
The Internet has become a precious tool in spreading news and information not necessarily sanctioned by governments, nor by their own private tool – the MSM (newspapers, magazines, television, radio). If governments misappropriate their authority (past history proves this premise) at some future date, then ordinary citizen news bloggers could find themselves denied Internet access for any excuse of their choosing.
So here I am, 4 months later, wondering what might have happened if I had bigger balls to put myself out there. I know what I'm scared of and what I'm not scared of. Guess it's gonna take some time to change. But do I really want to? Someone once told me that every gay man needs a "slut phase". I don't buy it, but it is curious and entertaining to toy with the idea.
33. Punky Brewster
We aspire to be something like an NPR talk show, but focused on copyrights
This blog is mainly meant for Sweden domestic, but I make one article in English summarizing the status and my considerations on this blog.
I was thinking. while I was making my sister some crazy-hippie-organic-home-made-ginger tea, I thought that I would like to know more about you all.
Brian Tracey says, “Perhaps the most powerful influence on your attitude and personality is what you say to yourself, and believe. It is not what happens to you, but how you respond internally to what happens to you, that determines your thoughts and feelings and, ultimately, your actions. By controlling your inner dialogue, or “self-talk,” you can begin to assert control over every other dimension of your life.”
The title “Sorry, Jane. We are Alcoholics” carries the overall concept of our EP. When we were making the album, we all drank a profuse amount of alcohol and got involved in all kinds of mishaps with other people. So the phrase really rang true to us. Quite possibly, our next album will be called “Don't clap, Marie”.
be back tomorrow to share the cutest cookies
I’m sorry, but that’s how it is.
- Like wan tam Silvi's (his woman) kid come in our room, after first night of me maikin sam dough far Leno, and the kid say: 'It in his shoe' which's war I had mah cash. I told Silvi bout this. She say: 'He said “Let's go to school,” not, “It's in yer shoe!!”
one little bacon cheeseburger won’t hurt…
I had to know.
Are you ready?! Because NaNoWriMo is only 2 DAYS AWAY!!!
Sometimes, John thinks Casey is a doll come to life.
Blah.
The Cushing campaign stop came just a day after Gallup released a poll showing that nearly 60 percent of Americans think the U.S. government should approve the entire Keystone project, which Obama rejected in late January.
The mystery wasn't all that mysterious to me. I could see the murderer coming from a mile away, and so when that 'Aha!' moment came, I wasn't all that wowed.
For the meringue, beat the egg whites with an electric mixer until they form soft peaks. Add the cream of tartar. Beat and then add sugar, a tablespoon at a time, and beat until stiff peaks are formed. Fold the vanilla into the meringue, and spread the meringue over the pudding, sealing it at the sides of the dish.
I’m so glad to have a real job.
I’m hoping this Mercury Retrograde will get no more points. I’ll get some herbs to push away the madness. Periwinkle, basil and dandelion should help me focus. I’ll also meditate and visualize those around me seeing things like I mean them. Of course, practicality and magic go hand in hand, in following that thought, I ask you: Say No to Double-Word Verification! my Wicked Luvs.
George Michael – Yorgos Panayiotou
For instance, say you hear about the release of a new high-rye bourbon and you're wondering it is sourced from LDI in Indiana. Just go to the TTB, search by the name of the whiskey, click to see the "printable version" and look for the tell-tale "Distilled in Indiana" on the label. The COLA approval will also tell you the name of the company that requested the approval, which can be helpful in searching through whiskeys that aren't forthcoming about their provenance.
I think AA Klenk had ADD/ADHD before, but there’s no proof, just yet… haha.
Lusting after the Starbucks drink I left in the car.
For some family time and Labor Day weekend, J & I ventured back to my hometown of Portland, OR. On our drive down, we started talking about how we default to the same handful of Portland restaurants. So in an effort to get out and explore my home-city, we turned to Yelp and off to Mother's Bistro we went.
Best of luck to Sims. No matter where he winds up, he’ll always be considered one of Bama’s.
- Penny Black Stickeroo from 'Wherever they grow' sheet, really lovely images for Easter on this set
Lily Buckner
I began one Monday morning, looking out all the ingredients, carefully buttering the cake tin and even cutting a greaseproof paper circle to fit in the bottom....and set to, all the while listening to Radio 2 and pretending that I was a Real Grown Up. I was wearing make up and perfume and nice trousers. I hope you're impressed.
Then in my young adult years (up until I gave up gluten and got my joints back...I'm still 27...till my b-day in a week and a half...that's still young adult right??) I would indulge in the chocolate chip muffins from Dunkin' Donuts when we made trips to the East Coast and then more frequently when we moved to Dallas. Now....If I want to buy a good muffin, I'll pick up a 4 pack of Udi's blueberry muffins...but I'm not really allowed to eat them, my 4 year old will disown me unless I sneak it, she's pretty possessive of her muffins....wonder where she gets that from!!!
I am sure you have heard, but Chicago is about to face it's its certain end with the impending snow that is headed our way like a black cloud.
Some people are lucky enough to end up in a satisfying and rewarding job that they really enjoy but for others wage labour is a grind; a daily misery that has to be endured. For such people the prospect of self employment has the appeal of making you "your own boss" and offering some (albeit limited and largely illusionary) freedom. But going into business, which is what becoming self employed involves, comes at a price. Hard decisions will have to be made regarding ones relationships with other members of society and it's not easy to be an entrepreneur and a nice guy. Another alternative is to get enough money together to buy your way into the landlord class, and the same tough decisions will have to be made. Of course not all business types and landlords are complete scum. Indeed many do their best to follow their chosen path in life and at the same try to give everyone a fair crack of the whip; there is after all such a thing as a good landlord. Clearly not in that category are the greedy, heartless swine who have decided to make a fast buck by evicting tenents in order to re-let the property (at hugely inflated rents) to Olympic tourists.
Professional Sound Systems – Would Investing in Audio Pay Off For Your Business?
Reduce the heat under the pot to a low setting, cover slightly with the matching cover.
laura called me while they were on the way to the hospital to tell me her water broke and i did not believe her. it was april fools and i for real thought she was joking. our whole conversation is recorded on video. hilarious. justin and i both planned on jumping in the car to surprise them but since ava had been sick we decided i would stay and justin would go
Fingers crossed I'll have some new creations to share in the next couple of days.
When I told them the name of my hotel, which was only about five minutes drive away, they told me I would never find it.
“She was taken to Wolverhampton Police Station, where she was given a caution and released.”
What do you think? Do I look pregnant in this top? (by the way, I'm definitely not pregnant!) Good thing I'm not easily offended.
The land to the left of both structures is wider than the land to the right; with an alley-like walkway strip to the right of the structures.
I had no idea that peanut butter removes that sticky gunk off of glass jars. Maybe I’m the last to know. If not, then try it!
I spent this morning at school. First the choir had a concert, and then the third grade gave oral book reports. From Judy Garland to Severus Snape all in the span of two hours – you gotta’ love it. What I also loved were the loud greetings of “Happy Mother’s Day!” from students and teachers alike throughout the hallways and in classrooms everywhere. What a nice celebration Mother’s Day is! I think that because the “giving” part is often coming from the direction of young children, there’s a certain enthusiasm to it I just love. I started to think about the origins of Mother’s Day, and I discovered the following tidbits:
It was fun to find this LO. It definitely needs some help! It only has like 10 layers total! Maybe I will redo it sometime. Anyway, I remember deciding I was going to try out this digi scrapping stuff after seeing some digi layouts on a friends blog. I opened up Photoshop and couldn't figure out how to do anything! I couldn't even move the photo around. I think I actually cried for a bit before enlisting my sister's help. After that frustration, I knew I needed some more help. So I decided to take some lessons. I took 3 or so classes from Jessica Sprague and learned TONS! She really helped me learn the program and some of the basics of digi scrapping. I am thankful I spent the money on the classes as it is a hobby that I still love to this day.
It is also time for the new challenge. The challenge is "Recipe Challenge - Use Embossing (wet or dry), kraft, pink, and orange." Make sure to stop by and share with us this week.
Little did he know that all the strategy was absolutely not sinking in. Why? Because we were already drunk. That was our strategy. It was to be our last game of the season. We had been brutally slaughtered in our previous games, and we knew there was no way we were making the playoffs. So we figured why not drink before the game? It might make the 50 mph rubber balls flying at us a little less intimidating. At this point, it really couldn’t hurt.
Have you been a fantastic communicator? If you are irritated about anything, have you got a temptation to complain and criticize? Evidently this may have been a good method of getting your path whenever you ended up being a 3 year-old, this is not the best way to win back a girlfriend. It is crucial that you can exhibit your ex that you can be a grownup and successfully convey your feelings. Substantially uncertainty, keep in mind idiotic behavior will not likely resolve nearly anything, so it will be always best to cultivate up and exhibit your ex that you can be a grownup.
11. And last but not the least, They will play your emotions. They will tell you they love you but who knows how many women they have said it too. For them its a word without meaning.
Henry’s hand shot up about this time. “I want to be a hairdryer, Mom. You be a toaster.” I’m thinking, “Dude you are SOOOOO a hairdryer!”
“And when you pray, do not heap up empty phrases as the Gentiles do, for they think that they will be heard for their many words. Do not be like them, for your Father knows what you need before you ask him. Pray then like this:
The break-up on iLove You is scaring a lot of people. So, I thought I’d say a few words.
I've started working since the start of the year on new work and loving it. My hope is that in April/May 2010 i'll have lots of new things to share with you my friends...
I am so exhausted. Please disregard any mistakes! I hope you all know how much you mean to me!!! Love to you all and God bless, Amy
In my next post, I will talk about mediators in depth, and give you some ideas about what they look like in psychology.
What is Miller Lite?
Rieckhoff explains that it’s important to maximize the efforts of small donors to contribute to the programs that the IAVA provides, which are plentiful. From the social networks of vets to a GI bill calculator and career fairs, the non-profit is dedicated to serving the needs of veterans. The veteran care in America has faced many challenges as veterans are not only at risk for psychological disorders, like PTSD, but also struggle to get basic healthcare and jobs. Rieckhoff says that some of the biggest work the IAVA has done has been in employment, where the company has uncovered a staggering 17% unemployment rate among veterans. To put that in perspective, the average unemployment rate for American citizens is 8.2%.
In Louisville the Kentucky Derby is cause for a huge celebration spanning the two weeks before the first Saturday in May. The Kentucky Derby Festival is a crowd pleaser with its numerous events. If one event isn’t your favorite, there is bound to be another that will pique your interest. As this is my last year in Louisville as a student (I hope to come back and visit), I tried to go to as many Derby Festival events as I could.
I’m bringing in turkey rolls, to be exact, to be eaten by the little darlings after their Thanksgiving skit. Delicious, condiment- and cheese-free turkey rolls. Mmmmm.
"Only two weeks ago, Sue Simmons, the veteran WNBC/4 anchor, uttered an F -word that was heard around the world. And today her penalty has shocked the world of TV journalism even more.
Born from above, Nicodemus!
Everything is ready? There is only a residual odor of cooking? Do not worry, especially – do not use deodorant or air freshener! This affects the taste of food. On the still warm stove plate put wet rosemary sprig. This is enough!
The truck swayed back and forth. Connor looked back, thinking one of Taylor’s football buddies was bouncing on the tailgate. No one was there, but at the outdoor dining area just outside of Crazy Dog’s pick-up window, several wide-eyed customers gripped their tables. A few sodas shook and toppled over. A kid he recognized from his Humanities class, a pint-sized sophomore named Albert, struggled to keep his balance at the take-out window, teetering like he was drunk. Connor shot a nervous glance out his window; the car next to them rocked too and its alarm went off.
God loves me. I know it, because He allows me to go through these funky phases where I mean well, but never follow through. I see them as they occur and I think to myself, ‘Wow…that was one of those moments that I should have made a better decision, but failed to do so.’ There are a handful of these incidents that happen on any given day. Reactions to callers at work, or family members on the phone. Dealings with my wife and child, or dealing with any number of disappointments that happen in a day that ends in ‘y.’ I have been shown favor in the eyes of my God, however, that He cares enough about me to continue to allow me to open my eyes and still have my breath. Strangely enough, I thank Him for this opportunity by continuing to spiral out of control. If my life was a car in the world full of grace that He displays to me, then it would be constantly in the shop for the gear being stuck in neutral with the gas pedal pressed firmly to the floor. I am a failure to myself, as well as to my God and family many times daily, and weekly. The one thing that never changes is that I will continue to try and I will still love each of them unending. It is a rare gift, indeed, to experience a love for someone that is so great that you would do anything that they ask of you, no matter the cost. This is the nature of love that God displays to us.
In a medium bowl, toss the chicken with the scallion whites, about half the garlic and ginger, the soy sauce, sugar, 1 teaspoon of the cornstarch, 1 teaspoon of the salt, the sherry, and the sesame oil. Marinate at room temperature for 15 minutes. Mix the remaining cornstarch with 1/3 cup water.
The whole being greater than the sum of the individual parts concept has worked well in other co-operatives and this initiative by Accidents Direct, who do have national reach, must be an option well worth considering for law practices that do not have the budget or expertise to compete with some larger firms or legal services providers.
I wish I could be all Oprahlike and give you all cars and shit- but I am working with what I got which means O'verlays and a pair pillow covers from my super awesome biz partner and seamstress Cheryle Rhuda. She was super sweet and wanted to jump into this giveaway too.
how is that you know
Ending on a rather thoughtful note- what was that first person thinking who decided to eat this thorny creature? And how sad that artichokes are never allowed to reach their full potential...life is strange.
The first view presented is the Seventh-Day Adventist view by Skip McCarty. There is much that McCarty rightly uses in defense of the Sabbath-Day view. He rightly starts in Genesis 2:2 and utilizes the Ten Commandments as given in Exodus and Deuteronomy. McCarty clearly holds a continuationist view of the Ten Commandments so much so that he believes the Sabbath rest is still to be held on what our calendars still call Saturday. Texts like Isaiah 56:5-6 & 66:22-23 are used to claim that the Saturday Sabbath rest is universal for all time. However, as Pipa points out, McCarty does not follow his application through since he does not believe we need to obey the other ceremonial observances (p. 76). What makes the Seventh-Day view stand out is that it does not recognize the resurrection event as having any bearing on when the day in which the Sabbath is held – changing from Saturday to Sunday. McCarty concludes his defense with this statement:
Unless you've been living under a very un-fashion conscious rock you have heard of, subscribed to, and bought from Gilt in the recent future. The premise of the website is both genius from a business sense and perfect for a consumer. The website features 36 hour sales of designer clothing from current or directly preceding seasons. From the runway Alexander McQueen to classic Ralph Lauren Purple and Black label suits, Gilt spans the spectrum.
They told me, Heraclitus, they told me you were dead,
* Sally Hansen Salon Effects - Laced Up
8. Miss Ann
Off to GirlScout drop off and time to head to the Y to run. Have to keep Evil Joy at bay while Evil Hubby is in Switzerland. WTHeck?!?! Switzerland!! Atleast he’s on a trip he’ll enjoy…right?!
Kazarian is in the back with Christopher Daniels. Daniels informs us it never was what he had holding against Kazarian, but rather what they have holding AJ Styles. They finally have the evidence, and perhaps they will show the world?
Next to her, her assistant Claire Wilson, then moi, then Catherine Pellegrino, who is also at RCW. They all came to support me at Bloomsbury for the launch party of the Troubadour paperback.
This weekend we’re planning on strolling through Niagara-on-the-Lake, visiting the beach, and planning our trip to Greece! Whatever your plans are, I hope that this weekend is a good one for you!
but my vision is long
Stamps:
I’ve been a teacher of hot-glass since the Spring of 2010. I’ve been a teacher of warm-glass since the Winter of 2009. The last time I took a hands-on course was in the Fall of 2008. NOW I’m finally back into a class where I’m NOT the instructor! This is VERY exciting for me!
carrots, yellow pepper, onion, kidney beans, cilantro, parsley, spinach, corn, green beans and ditalini noodles. Yummy.
I tried to look at you deeply
The magazine officially launches tomorrow (Fran's daughter's birthday in heaven, and just three days before Stevie's second birthday!), and I hope you will join us! You can find us on facebook here, or click the picture below to sign up for the newsletter.
Week 13: Sunday, Dec. 2, at Chicago, 10:00 AM
-On the completely opposite end of the spectrum, I've succumbed to the inner musical theater geek that lurks within and I've plowed through 2 1/2 season of Glee. I used to watch Glee when it first came out a few years ago but then I got over it (too much Lea Michele). On the way back from the Philippines I watched an episode...and now I can't stop.
$75 value of products donated from Etsy Recyclers Guild Members shipped to you!
POLICE INTERACTION #4:
But how does one pay proper tribute to all of the great men and women that have contributed to the fantastic successes of the U.S. space program? Somehow, a few photos and a video from the NASA archives just doesn’t do it justice. You know, I was too young to remember when the Soviet Union launched Sputnik, and I’m embarrassed to admit that I can barely recollect the assassination of JFK, but I remember his speech were he announced America’s mission to put a man on the moon! Even though my resources were limited, I read and watched everything I could find about rockets and space travel. For more about that, take a look at my Environmental Impact post.
Shanghai Kellys
(Early Days)
1/3 cup cocoa
My Cat: Luna Bubby
christmas is a time for remembering and sharing and loving. it gets me soo excited. if we didn’t buy a real christmas tree, i would put ours up in november.
The Topps Company Inc.
I hope you are having a good start to the new year ! This card is my first this year and I probably wouldn't have got it done if it wasn't necessary. My mojo has gone on vacation.
I was supposed to get up early on Sunday & run a 5 mile trail run, but the run got cancelled, so I made a pie instead. You know, like you do. Mary Katherine & Marshall invited us over for dinner, so I made the pie for them. I messed up the crust, but the pie was really good & not too hard to make. Recipe here.
But since the overthrow of the Mubarak regime the country has been under military rule and repression continued with numerous reports of bloody crackdowns on democratic protests against the military regime.
many in my extended family refuse to confront difficult issues?
Which is why I went to the basketball arena with a group from church to work at the brats and beer stand.
"The statesman that should rule the realm
"Getting dressed up for a festival is all about becoming another version of you," a spokesperson explains. "An exaggerated, bold and colourful character. So this year we are transforming the Deer Park into another world with our theme Fairy Tales and Comic Books."
7) assemble the trellis together by nailing through the back
Central to several hit songs and movies, the Profumo affair (which by today's standards wouldn't have made quite that big or extended a splash) escalated into a media circus, rocking British politics to its core.
Pray for the volunteers who are exhausted and hungry and overwhelmed by the need.
3.Dr Jekyll Mr Hyde (produced By Claws)
As stated in the new rules of the BFAwards, the Judges can add a title they feel was an egregious omission from the initial recommendations. This year they added 2 titles to the novel category, 2 titles to the novella category, and 1 title to short fiction. If a category has 5 titles listed, this is due to a tie on number of votes and points.
The 138th running of the Kentucky Derby is this Saturday! Time for big hats and big bets for the most exciting two minutes in sports. Can’t make it to Churchill Downs in Kentucky? Host your own Derby party on your own “Millionaire’s Row” with Mint Juleps and good Southern food.
Super thin and light
Altbier
A couple of people have asked me to do a best and worst of Schwarzenegger’s films, so here it is starting with the best and for an ex bodybuilder from Austria he hasn’t done bad at all with some of these films being my favourite action films of all time.
Goal: You pick! You can participate in a review-a-thon... a read-a-thon.. or BOTH, if you are feeling really adventurous.
Thank you, Father for desiring more for me than I even desire for myself. Thank you for tugging at the things I’ve held on to for so long. Help me to release them into your capable hands. I am eager for the restoration you promise.
If you’re a dog, then I guess we just found Pete’s equal
1. The Roaches have to be over 2 1/2 inches making it an adult Madagascar hissing cock roach.
Yet one of his 10 rules continues to bother me:
4. Finally, each week we learn a little bit more of the Lord Ruler’s history. And each week it has a different impact. This week’s snippets had the same impact – I was really interested in the excerpt when he mentions that the Darkness is not as oppressive when higher up in the mountains – do you have any more ideas about the Darkness?
This schism between the older and younger generations, between the mafia and the anti-mafia, is interestingly textured with the visual of flying. Director Marco Tullio Giordana (who went on to make one of our favorite films, La meglio gioventù) peppers the film with symbols of flight: from the "national anthem of Mafiopolis" and Peppino's childhood favorite (Volaaaare, whoa whoa! Cantaaaaare, whoa oh oh oh!), to a number of scenes where characters look longingly at the nearby airport. Everyone, it seems, wants to escape things - poverty, Gaetano Badalamenti (Tony Sperandeo) and his goons, this "provincialism" (as one northern Italian hippie says) - but everyone is grounded, strangled even, by their circumstances.
Maybe the tunnel really will end.
Can you see the texture? Underneath her is a crumpled sheet of a McCall’s pattern, there are doilies, journal paper, textured paint, rub ons, and stamped images.
On the phone at work I spoke with another dispatcher, after giving her the information she needed to know, I said sorry I couldn't help her more. She proceeded to tell me that it didn't matter and that the officer didn't have very good radio etiquette and she would tell him to call if he needed more information. Figuring this was the end I said, good luck. She went on to tell me about her work schedule, a co-worker, and her plans for the weekend. Even her friends' wife and the medical problems she had. I don't even know this dispatchers name!!
And if you only sell to your mom and dad and the other eight copies are bouncing around in the trunk of your car, then are you legitimately published? Are you put on the same level as...well, shall we say, an e-published author?
When cookies are cooled completely enjoy with some ginger ice cream!
These signs have always bothered me. Essentially, they are saying, if you choose to walk here, you may get hit in the head by a hunk of ice falling off our ginormous building. Don't say we didn't warn you!
However, Mr Seng is still active in his grassroots work in Ang Mo Kio GRC and just visited Ang Mo Kio Hub on Monday to ‘recce’ the place after a Singaporean lodged a police report that her son was almost ‘abducted’ by a PRC couple there.
“Pinoy receiving all the benefits that our gov is providing them. Of coz they are praising our ” beloved” gov. Its like our gov are allowing FTs to enter your house and use your toilet and maybe have a fling with ur wife /gf and then telling u to move on and it’s unavoidable.
I pray that I can “have more soul” when it comes to professing the identity of Christ.
The Magical LED Dance Floors
After the terror of the industrial period, in which child labour was the norm, and the agrarian population were forced into degenerate urban living, much of the UK outside the financial City of London was abandoned to rot, with the urban centres fast becoming third-world slums. The manufacturing base of the UK was destroyed to make way for the servile service economy. Every tragic twist in the life of the ordinary people of the UK has been orchestrated by the despotic regime in London. Our country has been used and abused to benefit the Establishment; including the social-engineering through mass-immigration and the deliberate obliteration of our formerly self-sufficient economy. Every part of the UK has suffered through the Talmudic mania of the Establishment for an international financial empire. To the rulers, we are indeed cattle; fit only to fight in their wars, and to provide their wealth.
So what should you do about the brown noser in your office? Nothing. Just sit back, eat a muffin and enjoy the show! Everyone knows that they never get ahead. Momentarily it’s a rush, the boss is being fed well (both physically and emotionally), you’re not being micromanaged due to his new distraction. Think of them as your own personal gatekeeper to a peaceful and uninterrupted day.
So I hope you will give this dish a try. Enjoy the video.
Conwy Council is counting all borough and community votes between 9am and 4pm on Friday centrally at Venue Cymru, a horrible decision!
Whomever John Peel promoted on his program was guaranteed to provide interesting listening. Peel’s been gone a few years now, and is still greatly missed. It would take a lifetime to catch up with all his recorded BBC sessions. His tastes were wide-ranging and impeccable.
But when from earthly toil we rest,
Then the instructions are, “You shall love the Lord, your God, with all your heart, with all your soul, with all your mind, and with all your strength’. Now go deep, deep down within your own soul – not with foreboding, fear, and unbelief, but with a glad free, thankful heart, knowing that that which you stand in need of is already yours.
Marge: Is that bad?
that followed you in from the woods.
This includes me. Don't accept what I say here because I have a small publishing company or because I state my opinions rather strongly. Check it out. If what I say doesn't make sense to you or your don't agree with me, then don't take my opinion on as one of your own. Because I could be wrong or I might not have been clear trying to express my thoughts.
Over at ABC News one can play “fantasy” election – by mapping the electoral votes by state, awarding the states that one believes would go to Mitt Romney and those that Might go to Barack Obama – ABC Currently favors Romney: with 198 to Obama’s 196 solid votes (either Democrat or Republican based on voting history of the state in question – Obama picks up 54 votes for states that “lean Democrat”, while Romney has 11 that lean Republican, there are 82 electoral votes that are “could go either way”, from the following states: VA, NC, IA, FL, NV and CO. Of course, one might use an entirely different method of playing this game - basing it on the Presidents job performance numbers, state by state. Any state over 50% approvals (and that includes states where his approval is at 50.1%) is a fairly safe bet for Obama – there are, according to Gallup’s latest findings: 10 states where Obama enjoy a 50% or better threshold of job performance approval. This has been consistent with the last three survey’s taken by the polling firm – Approval January 2012, February 2011, and the first in February 2010, when the map looked a little bright for the President, the top states where his approval ranked higher than others, remained the same.)
I got in!
Dressed in a flowing white tunic and with a mellifluous and eloquent voice, she makes an odd pair with Merlis, whose bald head and Brooklyn accent peg him as a surly police captain straight out of central casting. But their artsy-gritty counterbalance forms an appropriate partnership in producing a book about Gowanus.
I shot this in an amusement parlour a few weeks ago, with the permission of the staff. As soon as I saw the changing colours on these segmented platforms, each for a single player, I knew I had to take a shot. I chose my angle carefully, to include the silhouette on the right and the metal stool on the left.
Destini tattles on Kali - Kali not so much
People in my generation are much different from our grandparents and different from the younger generations as well. My grandparents probably got very little advertising exposure outside of the paper and radio. Today’s generation doesn’t even bother with either of these mediums. My generation is really the first commercialized generation. we all know that the Super Bowl is the biggest time for advertising in the United States. I grew up during the era when this concept was born. From the early Nike commercials to classic beer ads, every year they tried to top the year before. I feel this kind of had an effect that was not intended.
Elizabeth Ann Bayley was born in New York in 1774, and in 1793 married William Seton, a wealthy importer. During her marriage, she put her prominent position in society to good use, founding a charity group that raised money for the poor widows of New York. In 1801, William Seton went bankrupt and died two years later in Italy, leaving Elizabeth with five children to support.
they haven’t been
I could feel them now, their interest and kindness and their individual thoughts gently probing. "It's Ok, you'll be fine," one of them said straight into my head. "We are not that bad," added another reproachfully. So, I relaxed and let them into my head and they, in turn, let me into theirs. It was just like I remembered from my first two weeks or two days or whatever it was. It was bliss.
Seven younger generation Cahiers regulars -- Charles Bitsch, Claude Chabrol, Philippe Demonsablon, Jean-José Richer, Jacques Rivette, François Truffaut and Eric Rohmer (By the end of 1955, Maurice Scherer had pretty much abandoned signature in his Christian name in favor of the nom de plume "Eric Rohmer".)
3) The time of grating, measuring and mixing this together.
There are straw hats
In this sense the situation resembles the regime changes we observed in Iraq and Yugoslavia. Puppet governments of the Western allies are running more or less failed states after they had been demolished by the Western military machine. The economic take-over took place successfully. And administrators like Boris Tadic or Nuri (Dschawad) al-Maliki guarantee the new status quo.
Communication is tool that each and every one of us is required to utilize on a daily basis. Without having the power to voice your opinion, it can be challenging to connect with people on a personal level. We not only need to connect with people on a personal plateau, but a majority of us are also responsible for establishing common ground in a professional manner.
and knit me together in my mother’s womb." -Psalm 139:13
then what's the reason of wearing the hijab? what happened to 'modesty'?
The first 500 fans you may have lost because you didn't interact with them. Do you lose them because you didn't post a lot and fell off the radar? They are probably friends. If they were already reading your blog, remind them there to go back to like your FB page.
You guys are in more than one band, you live in different places… how does that affect Rain Over Battle?
The Salvation Army Women’s Auxiliary has released their 2011 holiday card. This year’s 5×7 full color card was designed by local artist Melinda Roeleveld and features The Salvation Army bell ringers in downtown St. Louis across from the Peabody Opera House.
This book is the story of a young girl, Rose, who discovers she can taste emotions in food – specifically, the emotions of the person who prepared the food. Hence the title, which I must say I found intriguing – Rose’s mother Lane bakes her a lemon cake, and Rose experiences all Lane’s sadness and frustration – and later the heady emotions of a new affair. This is an appealing idea from the point of view of the storytelling, since it gives Rose (and therefore us, since the story is told in the first person) a privileged view of the other characters in the book. However, this did not provide the insightful narrative I thought it might; instead it mainly produced descriptions of the various factories where items were manufactured, the emotions of the cows and chickens who were responsible for some of the ingredients, and rather pointless descriptions of the inner lives of bit-part chefs.
All the cozies I'd seen wrapped around the sides of your mug and fastened with a button, like Penelope's. Then last week I saw this inspired idea....a crochet coaster and mug cosy in one......brilliant !!
Dustin Martin once gave the ‘don’t argue’ to a kraken.
The possibilitie are endless, although I think there are endless uses of ifttt.com within the educational setting, i do think the biggest pull for teachers will be the organisational aspect of this site, the ability to post notes, clippings etc to areas in which you save items to read later will be invaluable to a busy teacher like myself who plans to catch up on the 40+ instapaper screen dumps he has saved today alone!
And finally, nominate 10 other extra special bloggers, and include a link to their blogs.
I did this to you.
macaroni and cheese (every kids perfect food).
Some people think the fact that these lipsticks stain is a good thing because... honestly i don't understand why they think this is a good thing! If you scrub the product off obviously it means you don't want to be wearing the colour anymore, and if you don't remove your lipstick then you can't see the staining! Also the purple colours don't stain purple, they stain pink. And imagine if you were wearing a bright, odd colour, say No She Didn't (which is bright blue) and then the next day you had to work, your boss might not be happy with you having zombie blue lips!
A joint legal document signed by both Rakesh and Laxmi made it official and provided a road map for other young brides to do the same.
Tomorrow, expect roadblocks and jams as police would try their level best to minimise traffic flowing into the vicinity of Dataran Merdeka.
Erin Willett (Team Blake) – Singing Set Fire To The Rain. I wasn’t a fan of the way she started off the song. I was really waiting for her to get to the pre-chorus. The chorus was really nice. The bridge was better. That is my favorite part in the song. If you don’t know me, this is my favorite Adele song and it has been in my set list for a couple months now. I am huge fan of this song. Xtina said that Erin sang her heart out, but is always wary of when someone does a song on that record. Adam said she did great, but try working on her phrasing because Adele has great phrasing. 1-855-VOICE-05
Hope it inspires!
If you’re put off by the prospect of making your own, though, three main brands are common enough to find on the shelf at your local boozery or through online vendors ; Bols (from Holland), Verpoorten (Germany), and Warninks (made by DeKuyper Royal Distillers in Holland). A bottle of any of these is readily available for $17-28.
While the salmon is cooking bake the bacon at 350 for 15-18 minutes. Bring a pot of water to a simmer, almost boiling but not quite and add in 2-3 tbsp white vinegar; this helps to keep the egg white together when poaching the egg.
The comedy, mainly provided by the shepherds and the rogue Autolycus (Tony Bell), seldom hit the mark for me. It all seemed a bit naff, even quaintly old fashioned. After interval the light rises on a drumkit with "The Bleatles" written on it, signalling the emergence of a chorus of sheep on hands and knees in white fairisle jumpers, and lots of slick stage business parodying Glastonbury hippies. Maybe it felt just too eager to please: even Bell's bravura Iggy Pop impersonation (and let's face it, a half-naked rock star screaming about daffodils has a certain charm) lacked edge, that real raw thrill of sexual danger.
Population Constant, except for the government confronted subspecies eremophilus, which is restricted to Inyo Nation, Florida, and has dropped due to deterioration of its natural riparian habitat; it may number less than 200 people.
4. Inside The Heart Of The Universe by Toru Takemitsu
Gravatte has been painting a series of canvases featuring 'site specific' scenes around and about Sierra Madre. The first in the Sierra Madre series was “The Old North Church” painted in 2004. Using oils she paints in a Contemporary Traditional style with a touch of Impressionism - making pencil sketches, studies and painting on site - with the exception of huge canvases which are painted in the studio. She has painted a canvas for us for our Art Fair. The site was chosen, with much thought, by the Art Committee as a treasured view of our town and our mountain Jones Peak. Entitled “It’s A Good Life”, the painting can now be seen hanging in the Library reference room. Gravatte will have a booth at the Art Fair so stop by her booth to see some of her other lovely work and maybe take a painting home.
When he actually sat up and started to look around--for something to get into, no doubt--that's when I said, "Are you awake and want to play?" and after I asked about where he should go to play, he heads off to his room. I fell back asleep.
As you may notice in the photo on the right, we ordered some rolls to try. We ordered Spicy BC Roll and Dynamite Roll, I think thats their names. Anyway, they are the ones that have BBQ salmon skin in them. When done well, the salmon skin should be crunchy and mixed well with the rest of the roll. In this case, the salmon skin was too hard and tough to chew. I ended up eating the rest of the rolls and picked out the salmon skin (the roll’s main ingredient).
Professor Jennifer Kreder attacks the subject of US Executive policy on Nazi-looted art on the Prawfsblawg here. The Executive Branch started an exception to the Act of State Doctrine known as the "Bernstein Exception". In the Bernstein case, the State Department indicated to the Southern District of New York that it was free to unwind any act of the Nazis because the US did not consider the Nazis a legitimate government and the Second Circuit affirmed the District Court's power to review and invalidate Nazi acts.
But there is now a problem with the icing. I don’t have the right ingredients – which are the things that clog up your cupboard all year round until you actually need them, at which point they mysteriously disappear – and my food colouring bottles consist of yellow and green. The only colour combinations for my petit fours will therefore be yellow, green and a sort of gangrenous yellowy-green – not at all the pretty little pink cakes I’d imagined.
"That's not possible."
Perhaps next year we can also define “world beer” as “imported beer that appeals to adventurous drinkers seeking an authentic premium taste.”
“Sometimes, the taxi would break down and the repairs would cost RM20 or RM30. On certain days, if you are unlucky, you get stopped by the police and the passenger you’re carrying is forced to get off and you don’t get paid,” Ang reminisces.
Will sing
It’s true. I have not made these cookies. Instead, I decided that it was time to rise above my unfair dislike of coconut and, in honor of hot summer days, put up a recipe that touches on the tropics. The pictures are good enough for me.
Shall I be kind and post one tomorrow?
That’s a very simplistic view though and the entertainment industry will always find new ways to stay on top and get noticed by the general public. Which is a little sad.
I guess you had to be there, but it was the funniest moment of my day so far.
If you own and drive a GM, you can also share your thoughts about your vehicle for a chance to win a $100 gift card. Go here to do so.
I took all of these signs very seriously and decided that She wants me to move out of my haitus and bring Her and Her energy into the world so that many can drink from Her eternal waters of Love and Compassion.
Please let me know of any more cogs that can help, I would love to be debt free this year!
Working Hard and Believing
YES. FOR CRYING OUT LOUD JUST TAKE THE STUPID SHIRT OFF.
The problem is that the political ruling class – the council gang of eight – has dominated and controlled public business. This has been the case for the past five years.
Why It’s Working: The organization provides more than 2.3 million men and women returning from tours of duty in Iraq and Afghanistan with education, job, health care and community-building opportunities — an immensely valuable tool for soldiers readjusting to civilian life.
5. You might even get published
15. The Slits - Vindictive
At the time I thought, well, okay... but we didn't really know any of these other unschoolers well enough to show up at their homes with our overnight bags.
May 5: Full Moon in Scorpio
It may look like they’re partners, but really, they’re pushing against each other. As hard as they can. And the question I have to ask myself is, which side am I pushing for? Right now, in this moment? Even when?
He goes on to defend “the beauty of working here at Forest City Ratner,” where those at the campany can make a difference in a city that needs to grow, that faces a housing crisis in the midst of growth.
Maybe after a few sessions I’ll ask for it.
Did President Barack Obama obliquely compare MA Republican Senatorial candidate Scott Brown to a Klan member today in Boston as he tried to fire up floundering Democrat Martha Coakley’s base? After lauding Coakley as being independent, he stated, “I hear that her opponent is calling himself an independent. Well, you got to look under the hood.” After a slight pause, the crowd laughed heartily and some audience members behind him looked at each other and appeared to exchange knowing looks.*
What was the point of the attack? Well, it was reported that 93,000 accounts had their credit card details stolen, so some sort of financial motive could have been behind it all. The attack caused a huge amount of aggravation, a common goal in the day and age of ‘LulzSec’. That might have been the reason. Sony had angered a few people with its aggressive suing of ‘hackers’ and the removal of Other OS, the homebrew communities favourite. Any of these could have been the true motive. Honestly, we don’t know ‘why’, but do we know ‘who’?
PERRY: Well obviously, before you ever get to that point you have to build a relationship in that region. That’s one of the things that this administration has not done. Yesterday, we found out through Admiral Mullen that Haqqani has been involved with — and that’s the terrorist group directly associated with the Pakistani country. So to have a relationship with India, to make sure that India knows that they are an ally of the United States.
Mom explained to the vet that she had wanted to make sure that she could test me at home before switching over. They were nice and tested Mom’s meter against theirs. The first time, it was only 3 points off. The second time, it was almost 30, so… Mom’s not 100% confident that it will work. They did give her another way to test. Apparently Purina makes Glucostrips that you can put in the litter box and which react to sugars in the urine. The color they turn tells you how much sugar is present. The vet suggested using these, rather than coming in so often for bloodwork, and monitor my sugar that way. If there’s two days in a row with a “negative” – meaning no sugar present – call them and we will adjust my insulin. It’s possible, with this, that we can eliminate my need for insulin entirely, or at least, get me down to a very low level (if my poor kidneys can’t heal themselves 100%).
It's hard to believe that we have two children now. But, at the same time, it seems completely natural. I know things will get easier once Connor is on a normal schedule and I can get some sleep in the evenings.
The cold shock also sends adrenalin and endorphins racing through the body, producing a feeling of well-being that lasts up to four hours after a cold plunge.
14 December: Evening after waiting, not receiving card nor call, I call them. They say they tried to reach me and I was unreachable. They tried once. I had given them an alternate mobile number which also uses the same network!!
Of course, events in Denmark were not taking place in a vacuum. The election of the centre-right coalition and the growing realization on the part of European publics (if not yet their governments) of the magnitude of the divide between Muslim and non-Muslim Europeans did not go unnoticed in the Muslim world. Despite initial displays of sympathy from Muslim governments around the world following the July 5 attacks, retaliation against the Danish state (or the Danish Entity, as Danes themselves now humorously referred to it) by the Muslim world was swift. Having learnt valuable lessons during the MCC, the new Danish government had increased security and withdrawn non-vital personnel from its embassies throughout the Muslim world immediately upon being elected. However, Danish diplomatic and business interests were attacked in Pakistan, Algeria, Egypt, Syria, and Iran, resulting in dozens of deaths and the almost complete withdrawal of Danish corporate activity from Muslim-majority countries. Danish citizens were warned against travelling anywhere in the Muslim world, though the number who would have felt inclined to do so was presumably negligible by then anyway.
“Not the sun, apparently,” she replied lightly, trying to ease into a conversation, which, at the same time, she hoped would end shortly.
The guards answered, “Never before has anyone spoken like this one.”
Anyway, we all got beautiful, then called it a night and went to sleep.
And in the afternoon? Drinking pear ciders while discussing an application for the ATYP Foundation Commission. The idea that is being developed between myself and a theatre practitioner friend of mine is coming along swimmingly! I love that the idea is so different, intriguing… and just a tad bit sordid!
What's new with you?
Obesity. To some people this word has little meaning.Many people do not understand obesity. Obesity is actually a disease. Many people suffer through both physical, and emotional pains from this disease. This disease is not to be taken lightly and can, and will, do serious damage to someones life.
On a work-related note, did manage to finish one commission, second one in progress. However I still haven’t been able to take any pics, this holiday madness has me running around through the small amount of daylight. It’s frustrating! If not before, then I know that on Monday I will be home during that time though.
While Ideas from the Pond might first come across as congruent, in terms of the consistent prominence of synthesizers and their style of programming, Dundov actually travels diverse terrain here, often within the same track. “Distant Shores,” for example, starts with an arresting plucking sound that soon has many layers weaving around it. It moves through various stages, building to a complex climax of dramatic, clattering drums and lyrical arpeggios, and then whispers out at the end, like a dream fading away. It’s pretty central to his charm that Dundov can hit that kind of effect and have it not sound trite.
You can see and, if interested, order this book by going to
Jack considered. "Well, not exactly with him, but we can return here."
Making his way on his path
As I referred to above, the number of years till everything takes a drastic turn for the worse could be quite soon!
For winter has vanished,
4. Prepare food for each week on Sunday nights this month. I’ll have to do this for at least the 10 day cleanse, but to help me get serious with my food and losing weight this has to be done every week! B+ This is another where I did 3 out of 4 weeks of this. Two of the weeks I made these tasty enchiladas which I’ll share with you in another post!
Maybe it doesn't matter how good our aim is if all we are shooting is marshmallows with slingshots.
As part of living a mindful life, I like to assess every now and then what's working and what's not working. I don't want to get stuck in a rut of doing something one way just because it's easy or comfortable if it's not working out well for all the members of my family. I'm delving into this in the more personal areas of my life privately, but here I'll share the unschooling/parenting aspects.
If the SNP don't win an outright majority by a massive landslide it is a personal disaster for Alex Salmond and Nicola Sturgeon.
On May 12, 2011, some minute measure of “justice” was given to the memory of the millions of concentration camp victims when Demjanjuk was convicted of accessory to the murder of 27,000 prisoners. He was sentenced to five years in prison with credit for the two years he had already spent.
Thanks for all the comments and phone calls. I appreciate your support, everyone! Before this, I didn't know it was so commonplace, and I was really worried when I was told I had to have one of these. I'm glad that it essentially turned out to be nothing more than a shitty day. (Get it? Shitty day?)
For example Paul in his letter to Titus quotes the Greek philosopher Epimenides: ”One of the Cretans, a prophet of their own, said, “Cretans are always liars, evil beasts, lazy gluttons.”. Here you see Paul, in the Holy Spirit, using a cultural reference Titus would understand.
"Don’t worry.. We’ll sail again next week.." the Captain said. Trying to cheer him up..
K: That Lytle piece aches in a really beautiful way.
In January this year a similar instance in Makiyivka, although there is rumour that these explosions were part of an attempt to blackmail the State for money by those responsible. As they were never caught, that motivation remains a rumour.
The largest of the drakes and by far the strongest. Their craggy natural armor makes them look like nothing so much as a rock outcropping when they stay still. They're extremely ornery and especially enjoy engaging in battle with other humongous creatures.
Speaking of creating... nothing finished to share with you as I've been busy drafting some designs for quilts and some sewing patterns. I've managed to whip up a couple of prototypes too, but they are staying under wraps for now. Those need some more tweaking, so more prototypes will be made. Things are getting a bit messy in the sewing room as more fabrics are being pulled from the stash, including some scrappy bits in hopes that some of these newly drafted ideas will soon be made into something share-worthy. ;o)
- The bloodhound is the only animal in the world whose evidence is admissable in court.
Twenty-six years have passed since Grandma died, and on this Easter weekend, her spirit rises in me. I cut off the lawnmower and go to the basement in search of my clippers. I cut the blooms from her lilacs, fill a mason jar with cold water from her well, and place her gift to me on our kitchen table.
Im frustrated right now and shutting down mentally. I’ve barely touched dinner but that’s because my friend thinks I’m having digestive issues, not that I ate a half a bag of chocolate raisins that didn’t taste that great anyways. She’s gone for the weekend. As much as I don’t want to let her down by falling off the program, I need to fall apart for a few days.
Then I’m told that the object of the event will be for the students (in this case, sixth graders) to stand around said circle and hurl as many small beanbags as they can into cart before the time runs out.
What I Would Say To B if he ever says to me ‘I Wish I didn’t have aspergers’
I feel like a child, seeing things for the first time with a brand new set of eyes. I realize now that I could not be forced to enter a beautiful world. I had to see it for myself. I wonder… how could I show you?
Because, come rain or shine (and many will pray for the most unseasonal – unreasonable – weather imaginable), around about a quarter of the entire population of Belgium will emerge from their doorsteps from dawn onwards, to gather along the roadsides that lead to the shrines of cycle racing that litter this tiny corner of Europe.
I do have kids. I was a single mom with my oldest, so didn't think it was possible to homeschool her, until my son was born and I found a way to stay home, and I've found a way since :) We are going on 4 years :))
Of his toxic infection
(3) Modern vernacular translations of the Bible are unpopular with such persons because, in attempting to reflect the individual characteristics of the original Hebrew and Greek texts, the translators violate this assumption.
Spence Campbell (REP) 1.06% 14
Generation Spokesmodel
Need to move the couch and then there won’t be anything heavy left. After the aquarium that is.
"Coming up now. This is completely fantastic! It’s the new one from 'Dexy's Midnight Runners' and it called Geno!
Your Move/I See All Good People
We buried the baby last night under Lucia's tree. We lit a fire in our small fire pit and dusted it with sage and cedar, sea salt. I prayed for comfort and release from grief for my children. We read a prayer that I love. Hopi Prayer for the Soul's Graduation. Chris and Lani shared it for Silas' memorial, and it felt right last night. I cried, for the first time overtaken by tears completely, letting her be the wind. The dew. The swift uplifting rush of quiet birds. Little Lucia too. It seemed for her too.
‘Hmmm, okay we’ll fix it.’
-Al.
I don’t know if these will turn out right, but I refuse to give up.
Now go back and read the THIRD word in each line from the top…
So I will just do it right now! I totally forgot about it with all the things going on in my life. Excuse me! It was Queensday as well that day!
As with any trend be careful not to paint yourself into a corner, so to speak, with all trend and no lasting appeal. Unless you can afford redecorating frequently you may regret spending so much on a passing trend and tire of the design quickly. More budget friendly, if you want to jump on the trend wagon, is carefully choosing a few trendy items as accessories but make your money go further with buying larger items that survive the trends. You may also be able to transform items you already own which could use a face lift. Adding fresh new colors and surface designs to existing furnishings or accessories can give you a nice change and a taste of that current trend you're dying to try. In the latter, we are approaching sustainable design, a good thing for our beautiful planet. ; )
She observed how that creature was making Revati’s life a living hell. It swapped her mails, took form of other members of the home to squabble with her, and when she was away from the home took her form to squabble with the members. Only Taru could identify it by a faint green glint in its eyes. But she kept that a secret.
Our project base is across Scotland at present but our doors are very much open to projects across the UK.”
Go me.
Kelp is still an integral part of the Japanese diet. The Japanese include kelp in almost every meal, using it in salads or as a garnish, or cooking it in soups, sauces, and cakes. Noodles made from kelp are a staple of the Japanese diet.
Over at Patricia K. Lichen, Author her Weekend Haiku & Limericks focuses us more narrowly than usual, asking us to get our inspiration from two sources. Visit for the possibilities and because it’s fun to wander through the site.
I've seen lettuce wraps before.
So a quiet Friday of writing was interrupted by Writers and Artists Yearbook, with a flash competition on Twitter. The challenge: tweet a story including the word “mime”. My entry:
On Monday her husband was killed in a motor vehicle accident on the way home from work - just like that her life has been turned upside down. With 2 young boys she is facing this with incredible strength and determination. Watching another close friend go through this over the last 15 months I know how much heartache there is ahead and the struggles this family will face. The lose of a spouse or loved one is one of my greatest fears of mine and don't know how I would cope in this situation. My thoughts and prayers are with you Helen and your boys.
We took Katie to a photographer today to get some new head shots for her acting auditions. It's important for her to have up-to-date head shots, because that's what casting directors look at first to screen potential audition candidates - for the bigger productions, you don't even get in the door for an audition if the photo isn't what they're looking for. And it's especially important for young performers to keep their head shots up to date because they grow and change so fast - you don't want to get called in for an audition only to be turned away because they were expecting someone younger based on the photo.
Happy Easter All. I've finally managed to get around to writing the second part to my technology piece...
These are photos from my first soccer team experience. I don't really have a team but we are assigned to groups within our age group and we do drills, games, and then at the end play a mini game. I seem to have a great time and burn off a lot of energy. And when I do focus, I can do pretty good things. For example, I'm pretty good at dribbling the ball between the cones.
to forgive me.
As to the story, it’s gut wrenching. There’s so much mystery and intrigue swirling throughout, but it never gets bogged down. It feels like a dead sprint to the end because I needed to know. Spotswood paints a vivid setting that lends the story further realism, but it’s her characters that really make the story. I fell in love with them immediately, investing in their safety and well being whole heartedly.
Country Music: DIY: Every musician can benefit from the example of punk rock music. And soon with the dissolving record label structure, many DIY ethics may be imperative to getting music heard by a large audience.
Now, we find all the Authorities of Jesus Christ our Big Brother, our Eldest Brother’s, and as a believer of Jesus Christ we need to know that we are given back the Authority which was stolen by the Devil from us, and use it against the Devil for the Lord has defeated and taken all the Authorities back from Satan as He died as our Eldest Brother, God dying as a man.
And this morning we woke up to 4 inches of fluffy snow with no signs of it stopping any time soon. I love snow, but after such a wonderfully springy Monday, it's a bit of a drag to keep yo-yoing like this.
“In too many cases”, the regulatory framework works against, not with small businesses.
Your daddy he’s an outlaw
However, Gee would settle down to pitch three more solid innings after getting out of the fourth. The Mets offense helped out by taking the lead right back in the top of the fifth. After Gee and Kirk Nieuwenhuis both struck out, Ruben Tejada and Daniel Murphy set the table with a pair of singles. Then David Wright lined his own single to right field to tie the game and move Murphy over to third. After Wright stole second base, Lucas Duda bounced a seeing eye single up the middle to score both Murphy and Wright and give the Mets a 6-4 lead.
The Plot of Harry Potter and The Prisoner of Azkaban:
As said previously, they were the last ones I remember the faces. I think I remember Seohyun first because she looks like somebody who now I don’t remember anymore :”). From what I see, they are well-loved by their fans, too. : )
It was not the only time a dipsh*t would be placed in a position of authority for which they were completely undeserving.
To all those heading out to Kauffman tomorrow for the home opener, have fun, stay safe, and most importantly, drink some great beer!
So when I hear someone say something stupid about unschooling, I try to remember how nearly impossible it is to perceive that we're wearing lenses while we're wearing them. And even when we know we're wearing them, how easily we come to rely on the clarity of the world view they provide.
I probably won't be able to work on it until the weekend anyway.
I have revisited the Cassie/Wedding/Emmy Lou issues and decided that the Cassie storyline CAN fit into the post marriage timeline. There were a few times during the Cassie saga that the phrase "15 years" also had the words "almost" 7 "about" tacked on, thus making it approximately 15 years after 1859, so placing it into 1877 can actually work (close your eyes and work with me here). Anyway, one thing follows another and since I placed last issue at Feb 1878, this one (68 days later will take place in April 1878.
-$2/1 Olay Body Wash Flu bookq
Violet deserved a treat. As he poured her tea, he took out his pocket knife and made a slight tear to his hand. He let a little blood flow into the teacup and passed it to his faithful companion.
And we can have a lengthy chat,
It turns out she did all of the above. The women in the poems range from those executed within the last decade all the way back to Mary Surrat, who was executed as a co-conspirator in the Lincoln assassination. There are times when she gets inside the women’s heads and tells the stories in their voices; other times, the poems are from the perspective of complete strangers who are only tangentially involved with the crimes or executions; other times there is a completely omniscient, detached narrator. Some of the poems concentrate on the crimes themselves, the motivations (or mental illness) behind them or the aftereffects, such as in “Wishing Well,” where a community pitches in to buy a– you guessed it– wishing well, and one of Betty Lou Beet’s (executed in 2000 in Texas) husbands ends up under it, or in the first-person poem “The Divorce,” which describes how Mary Mabel Rogers (executed in 1905 in Vermont) took her husband into the woods to poison him. Other poems, like the first one in the chapbook, “Peach,” about Karla Faye Tucker’s (executed in 1998 in Texas) last meal, draw further away from the crimes. The last stanza of that poem is squirm-inducing:
If you have never encountered a happy nerd, either you haven't looked, you don't know any nerds, or you're such a debbie downer you never see happy people. Nerd pride.
Alone, no one person can ease the pain of all of those who are suffering but together we can make a big difference insh’allah (God Willing).
Spring water from Welpman Spring in Morgan County, MO
According to TMZ.com, Martin wants joint physical and legal custody of the kids.
I ate the second piece the next morning for breakfast. I simply scraped off the remaining ice cream, plopped the leftover pie in the microwave oven for half a minute, then put the ice cream back on top.
Reviews left me simultaneously fascinated and repulsed, which is usually a good combination. I didn’t know if it was worth it to actually read the book though. The story itself was intriguing; I wasn’t sure how an entire book would play out. How foolish I was. Thank goodness a deep inner recess of my brain overrode the doubt and got the book from the library, despite menacing bedbug threat (in my mind) and I read the entire thing this weekend. I felt sad when it was finished. It is THAT good.
Katniss sparked a rebellion by defying the Capitol in the Games the same way the gladiator Spartacus sparked a rebellion by escaping from the school where he was being trained in Capua. Spartacus and the 70-ish men who escaped with him began raiding the lavish country estates of the Roman elite and the slaves belonging to these estates joined in, creating an army of thousands of slaves. Katniss’ and Peeta’s tale is similar because their defiance made one district after another join in the rebellion until District 13 came out of the shadow and organized the rebellion, taking it to its logical conclusion. Unfortunately for Spartcus, things did not turn out so well. After his army was defeated, the 6000 survivors (which did not include him as he died in battle) were crucified along the Appian Way as a warning to other slaves. Thus ended the Third Servile War.
In my hurry through life I have, in some ways, been neglecting this blog and my blogger friends. For that, I ask forgiveness. This morning I'm about to head off to the library to collect a good dozen new books, but before I do I wanted to stop and share these moments from the past few weeks.
what my legs must have looked like when my first-ever boyfriend told me I had pretty legs
"This is one of those groups that you really want to hear now so that later on when everyone and their grandmother is talking about how killer their sound is you can say that you knew them when (and actually be being honest for a change)."
Yesterday we attended the opening of the Modemeisjes (Fashiongirls) for Lade Side at the College Hotel.
A few weeks ago on a visit to Z Gallerie, I spotted a really cute alphabet print that I thought would be perfect for my son's room. It's a good size, but $99, so I refrained from purchasing it. When I saw the framed print again last weekend, I loved it as much as the first time so I went ahead and brought it home.
I have a very manic personality, going from one interest to the next with the frequency of a police band scanner. A month ago, I wanted to be a writer. Last week, I wanted to be a graphic designer.
SCHEDULE MARATHON SHOPPING TRIPS
no pictures were allowed, the whole tour was filled with such thanksgiving turkey inspired warmth I couldn't have minded for more than a minute. Spiced with audio recordings of Louis' laughter-speckled words, I wanted nothing more at the end of the tour than to give the musician a hug worth breaking world records.
If using chicken breasts, cut into strips or wedges. Season with salt and pepper, and sear in your favorite oil on both sides. Transfer to large casserole dish and pour in any extra oil from the pan. Cook the bacon about halfway in the same pan as you seared the chicken. Transfer to the casserole dish. Squeeze the juice of one lemon over the chicken and bacon.
Under the new guidelines, which take effect June 15, servicers have 30 days to review and respond to short sale offers or requests. If they need more than 30 days, they must provide the borrower weekly updates and a final response within 60 days.
I would love some suggestions on some pretty yet reasonable lighting options.
I feel real sympathy at my daughter’s maths disappointment. Fortunately, by chance, I bumped into a maths tutor – an elusive breed – and was able to arrange some private tuition.
Collards
"A schedule is for the days when life doesn't happen." (I hope I accurately quote.)
As I’m talking to the neighbor, I hear scratching. Our hearts stop. Wondering could it be? Could it be Molly? Trying to get in the gate?
I remember getting the email from my friend, Dee asking if I could be the Guest Designer for August 2010 and of course I had to say YES. The only hitch was that I was in the midst of a cross country road trip vacation with the family. Once we got to the in-laws house in Indiana I made my Mother-in-Law take me to the nearest Archivers (I had never been to one) and I bought all this fun stuff for the card. Although I was limited in most supplies I still had a blast making this and I love the way it turned out.
Without sampling the sounds, we did go so far as to name a recording after the spot. In case you missed out on the 50 copies of the New Beginnings Academy cassette, you can download the mp3s right here, right now. More information after the jump. Thanks to Amber for the photos of the true N.B.A. as well as help with making the gif.
The Handsome Family
Throughout this time we began investing in a new breed of company, the New Economy, a company that was an idea without profits.
Did I say perfect? Well, it was close. According to my nifty Key to the City passport book my key was supposed to unlock "the padlock on the right-hand door of the third gate you come to." As this gate was wide open we were perplexed and began searching around. Then, Alex found it, lying on the concrete like a dead baby bird lay the Medeco padlock, it had clearly been murdered, snapped with the deadly jaws of life of one angry New Jersian, trying to get into our city.
The task will sometimes take precedence: in a emergency, you won’t be consulting people about what to do; but the general trend in organisations has been to move towards the right-hand side of the spectrum. Hence the skills of effective delegation are an important part of management development these days. Instead of the rigid hierarchy, teams increasingly behave more like self-contained entities which draw in skills and resources as they require them to produce the required outputs. I visualise it like this:
Some of us use wood and nails to build our wall… one that goes up quickly but is also fairly removable without a lot of effort.
To mostly be where you are.
9-9:30 p.m. - Take in one of the largest fireworks displays in North East Florida at the World Golf Village! The annual "Red, White and Boom" show is sure to please! The show is slated to begin between 9 and 9:30.
It’s almost time for a weekend of disguises, family, friends, shivers, and of course some tasty treats!
The kingdom’s religious police enforce Saudi Arabia’s strict interpretation of Islam, which prohibits unrelated men and women from mingling. Women and men in Saudi Arabia remain highly segregated and are restricted in how they are allowed to mix in public. The separation of men and women is not absolute. Women in Saudi Arabia hold high-level teaching positions in universities and work as engineers, doctors, nurses and a range of other posts.
Those remarks seem especially indefensible, so of course they were defended by giant sack of shit Rush Limbaugh, who had this nugget to add to the national discourse:
#3: I had to be honest with myself about just how many glass vases, hurricanes, platters, etc I needed. The answer, as it turns out, is about 1/4 as many as I had. 3 trips to Goodwill remedied that issue.
How much you truly took advantage of me
What about you? Have you read any of the books in the Song of Ice and Fire series? Who are your favorite characters? What do like and dislike about the series? Let me know in the comments!
What if Anne Boleyn had drowned in her youth?
The implementation schedule, which is subject to change if unforeseen technical issues arise, is as follows:
Spiders crawl, up and up and up until they are as high as they can get without falling off and they stop and laughe a terrible spidery laughe and then they all fall on her hair and she screams and gauges her eyes out one by one every single 27 of them,
Small-blog traffic is down across the board, even as the 'big blogs' get more readers. It is increasingly obvious that blog traffic is like income: the 1% get it all, and us 99% puttering along down here at the bottom, are lucky to get any at all.
This hot mess is how I'm practicing for next month's cake competition (http://thattakesthecake.org/). For the past few nights my kitchen table has been subjected to some serious prototyping. Since this is for competition, I'm going to keep some details on the down-low. After the show I'll discuss my designs more in depth.
Into glistening moments now,
But like an idiot, I turned around to see where Ms. Valentini was in all the chaos. As soon as I did another hail of bullets assailed around me. I ran to may car, then shifted in.
And while we on the topic of questionable information being disseminated in Parliament…Dr Goopeesingh, can you tell me which report you got the figures from about national depression? You estimated 100,000 people. Was a survey done? Were all of these people diagnosed? And where were they diagnosed? At private offices? Public hospitals? Or were you taking foreign figures ad applying it to the local mileu?
Diversity is a neo-Marxist concept which destroys any real sense of community. In order to impose the artificial construct of diversity on the unwilling indigenous white population, diversophiles and xenophiles seek to undermine the English language, the teaching of British history, our institutions and culture. The following examples – a very small sample it must be added - illustrate the ideologically corrupting influence on language of the diversophile agenda. The words that diversophiles have sought to replace are in brackets: “Gender” (“sex”); “gay” (“homosexual”); “faith community/school” (“religious denomination”/ “religious school”); “young people” (“teenager”); “asylum seekers” (“illegal immigrants”); “hate crime”/”racist” (“rational objection to some part of the diversophile/xenophile agenda”); and “militant” (“terrorist”). In all these examples the intention is to deceive. Diversity itself also hides a multitude of cruel and barbarous customs: voodoo and eating human body parts, usually as part of primitive African rituals; importing rare animals; arranged marriages; threatening to murder people who write books that offend Muslims (The Satanic Verses, 1988); murdering people who publicly attack multiculturalism (Pim Fortuyn and Van Gogh in Holland); female circumcision; and intermarriage among close relatives.
Independence Brewing Co. was founded in Austin in 2004 by Amy and Rob Cartwright. Over the years the microbrewery has become a staple in Austin bars, restaurants and grocery stores. Independence has developed a repertoire of favorite craft beers available year-round in bottles, from the easy-drinking Austin Amber to the dark, rich and roasty Convict Hill Stout. The more adventurous fans seek out seasonal draft-only brews like the ESB and the limited Brewluminati series.
(I’m laughing as I type this….if you’ve just stumbled upon my blog you probably think I’m an asshole. I assure you, I’m not. Stick around – read some old posts – see the growth happen as the blog progressed! It’s really rad!)
All I know is this:
Happiness is a warm puppy, with a side of fries.
They make 2 sizes- size one for smaller framed babies, and size 2 for bigger/chunkier babies.
That impressed me. That's leadership. I wonder if any of that had any effect on what happened today. What I do know is that the difference between "us" and "them" has never been clearer, and that conservatives are going to try to make this the deal breaker in the election. Maybe they'll be successful. But whatever happens
Here’s what I’ve decided I can control:
‘We need to address that here in Dallas County, in our state and in this country. We are doing something wrong with our criminal justice system and we need to fix it.’
Snapping her head up and fixing her eyes on the sheepish intern clutching his half-eaten burger she begins her reprimand, “So you’re eating within my crime scene. Which means you’re contaminating my crime scene. Now do you really want to be responsible for letting this psycho walk, by sending the police to a burger joint when the killer is a vegetarian.”
Having a baby
Cannot see you today.
Another good sign is when the interviewer is rubbing his hands together. This gesture indicates satisfaction.
Christian has waited to take her, resisting the urge each night. It always ends badly with human pets. They’re too fragile. The longer he can wait, the better, because the moment he takes her, the clock on her life starts ticking down.
There’s a bit of him that’s about parents who become obsessed with their work to the point that they neglect their children. My son suffered some benign neglect while I was writing the book and some of my guilt is in there, although he was probably very pleased that Mum had something else to worry about for a while.
I’m thinking… maybe I should stick to photo posts! They are certainly more interesting to readers, especially if you are not like me! I love going through posts word by word, dissecting it and researching too… but otherwise… photo posts it is!
In my own life, fast forward a few decades. Saturday I am running yet another 1/2 marathon. Most likely, my perseverence and motivation stems from enduring elementary gym class! I am absolutely cherished, chosen, and chased by my wonderful husband and three sons. The Lord has lavished His love on and in my life. I am chosen. I have been picked! In fact, the night before I got married my mom read me the storybook, "I'd Choose You." It is about an elephant (Mom, what were you thinking...after all that trauma, an elephant!? Just kidding.), that gets the last seat on the bus, the worst lunch, and the last one picked on the team. The mother elephant says over and over in the book, "If I could have anyone in all the world, I would still choose you." (Thanks mom!)
Not surprisingly, scams are common – often dealers will use the old trick of stuffing fake cash inside a couple of genuine notes at either end of a pile.
This is a big step forward in human evolution considering that in our earliest of days we, like most other forms of animal life; used to dedicate our highest percentage of time on the task of acquiring sustenance. However over the thousands of years that we have been alive, we have learned how to take advantage of the seasons to grow our own produce as well as how to contain and farm animals such as sheep and chickens to keep a steady income of food.
One thing I'm disappointed in is the colour range, it's only available in two shades (light & medium) so you might find it hard to find a shade that matches you, I have it in shade light and it matches me really well and would probably match anyone who's skintone is between a NC20/NC30, not too sure how the medium shade would work out.
And as for Audrey, what blogger has not loved her bath tub settee in "Breakfast At Tiffany's"?
The game begins with players trying to form pairs out of all of their cards until someone—the loser—is left with the lonely, spinster old maid.
Idea 8: Zero-Positive is the result of a mind striving to step out of time … in order to see the eternal repeating patterns in nature. Change represents the temporal dimension seeping into an otherwise perfectly predictable, systemizable world.
-build a hen house because I really want chickens this year! They are so important for the garden and they will be my friends. They will be nice chickens, not the kind that peck your eyes out.
During this past year, I've learned that sometimes you just have to do what you feel is right...in your gut! (lol...figuratively and literally in this case! :-) ). This wasn't an easy decision to come by. Yes, I've heard of the nightmares and complications in some cases. I've heard of people dropping the weight, then in time, gaining it back. (Singer Carnie Wilson for one example had the gastric bypass, lost the weight, gained it back and is now having the lap-band done). She admits that she went back to her old ways. I've been finding out more and more that people that go through this have not followed up on what they are supposed to do. This includes counseling, support groups, exercising and of course, eating healthy.
A suspected sex trafficking ring in which girls as young as 11 were allegedly targeted was far larger than previously feared, according to police.
Angry fathers' outrage gets Huggies ad campaign pulled from television
We are not allowed to dismiss the revelations of God for Beth Yeshua. They are not just cute slogans and ideas.
From the mask in my picture, you could be forgiven for thinking that I have gone for ‘Burglar Betty’, the good woman who reforms – and marries – Allan and Janet Ahlberg’s ‘Burglar Bill’. But you’d be wrong. The white lumps are the basis of my character’s costume and it occurs to me that I should probably offer a prize to anyone who can guess who it is.
Drums - Tyshawn Sorey
I am finally finishing up the Hunger Games books. I am on the third book, sad for it to end but this one has not been nearly as good as the first two. Next on my reading list is Fifty Shades of Gray. I keep hearing about this book and want to see what all the hype is about.
The overall list of jobs dogs do is far too extensive to note here. However, Purebredbreeders.com hopes that an important point has been made. Dogs do more than just entertain and guard us at home, they are out in the field being heroes. Granted, there are many everyday heroes that go unsung. This is all the more reason to treat each pooch we come across with the best possible care, you never know when he or she will have to come to the rescue.
It's about time I posted a recipe that involves frosting, and it was quite delicious. Instead of baking them in regular muffin tins, I decided to go for a cutesy look with bite sized treats. I guess it is my way of having one cupcake and half the guilt :P
On January 7, 2012 the University marks an important milestone which will go largely unrecognized. It was on that day sixty five (65) years ago that the Provisional Council of the then University College of the West Indies had its first Meeting. The meeting was held at 13 East Street, in Kingston, the home of the British Council. Sadly, a car park now occupies the site so there is no physical reminder of the building. No plaque therefore can mark the spot.
Finally, a half-naked Kelly shows up, accompanied by Max, who is 90% naked. Kelly looks very annoyed as she walks up to the little red carpet at her party. She tells the camera that she was "late, rully rully late" to her own party. Do you know what her excuse is? An indignant "my kids had Halloween, and then it takes an hour and a half to get ready." There is kind of this unspoken "DUH!" hanging in the air. She is unbelievably STUPID and RUDE.
I'm praying for....Vision. Where there is no vision the people perish. I truly believe this is true. Both on a personal level and where our entire family is concerned!
Sounds like fun to me.
The evening is cooling off and I can see that I’ll be in the sleeping bag soon just to stay warm.
Leonnatus will bring me a warm cloth,
What is the point of living in tents (or booths or tabernacles) for seven days? (“Live in booths for seven days: All native-born Israelites are to live in booths so your descendants will know that I had the Israelites live in booths when I brought them out of Egypt.” (Leviticus 23:42-43 NIV))
The important thing is to choose your attitude. Negative attitudes have a way of passing on to everyone else in a group, creating a spiral of bad feeling. This often leads to conflict (especially common as families get together at this time!). But positive feeling is also contagious. No matter how bad my day has been, if I come home to a friendly and relaxed atmosphere my mood immediately lifts.
Eloise smiled, it's alright dear. I'll miss you most of all. You were always my favorite, although you stopped calling. I realise I'd stopped living 20 years ago, and I wasn't that fun to be around. 'Petra put a hand on her aunts and smiled wickedly. When you started drinking wine out of cardboard boxes, and put up those hideously orange curtains, I had to say stop. There would be no recovering from that, Eloise.
from November through
Jaikob was busy processing the enthusiasm in Kaelen's voice about something "yucky" and wasn't responding as readily as Kaelen wanted. Kaelen continued, "it tastes really yummy".
Now, I find the glass is almost gone!
There are far too many cosy looking deals that need to be stopped in future. For instance, Mrs Daisy Maile, wife of former Gauteng Shared Services Centre head Mike Maile, got a R3.6 million road works tender in December 2008.
Back in 2010, the Lifetime Network aired The Client List starring Jennifer Love Hewitt. Love, as she’s been referred to many times in the media since her role on Party of Five, plays a mother who takes a position at a massage parlor to make ends meet after her husband suffers an injury that prevents him from working. She later learns that her fellow masseuses are actually turning tricks and earning a fine living as prostitutes, serving some of the most prominent members of her community.
We are a direct supplier of natural gas and electricity. This means more savings passed on to you! Our plans are completely transparent and designed for long term management and mutually beneficial relationships. In addition, we have a dedicated team of energy partners offering services that including: energy audits and benchmarking, co-generation systems, alternative energy programs, lighting design and retrofits and commissioning. We even have in house funding available for lighting retrofits and gas conversions if qualified. These services are available to our customers through a complimentary no obligation analysis to determine if beneficial before proceeding.
A new element had been added to our family very recently. Ratchlet, TA and M-t-G had just acquired a new dog! She is a Llasa Apso named Dora. In retrospect everyone agrees that the timing probably wasn't the best. Nevertheless, we were looking forward to meeting the new dog and had told Ratchlet it was fine to bring the dog along! Nothing like a dog to liven things up and bring laughter and joy!
I am not sure I go along with Lewis on this.
suddenly turned into an intriguing surprise...
The peace plan “is failing thus far because Assad has not met the obligations that he has made to Kofi Annan,” the UN and Arab League special envoy who brokered the cease-fire agreement, Nuland said in Washington. If that continues, the U.S. and allies anticipate putting further pressure on the regime by seeking a travel ban, additional financial sanctions and an arms embargo at the UN Security Council, she said.
Then the boys got crazy and creative!
Christmas Do-Over ... ABC Family ... 9 AM
Genesis 41:45… “And Pharaoh called Joseph’s name Zaphnath-paaneah; and he gave him to wife Asenath the daughter of Potipherah priest of On. And Joseph went out over all the land of Egypt” (KJV).
2. Your birth certificate is an apology letter from the condom factory.
Ian Butterworth had also requested a border to the map, so for this Brian decided to continue the mosaic theme from his portrait of Alexander riding Bucephalas. This was the result:
Review: “Life Before Death. Strength before weakness. Journey before destination. The Knights Radiant must stand again.”
This is my temporary home, it's not where I belong,
Sister Simone Campbell elaborated on that idea in an interview with National Public Radio. Commenting on what might have motivated the Vatican’s leaders to take such an action, she said:
Locked Out, but with quite the view,
I feel safe.
The stout is getting the teaser roll-out at brewery tours (5-7 p.m.) this Friday and next Friday (Dec. 30) before hitting store shelves in 22-ounce bomber bottles in January as a Cricket Hill reserve series beer.
And finally you will need a sewing machine.
A few years back a friend of mine had given me a recipe for a simple Jamaican curry, any vegetable, curry powder, and rice. Determined to make something good out of what we had I set to finding the ingredients, some of them, like the coconut milk and oil had to be made. Digging through the back yard and making multiple market runs for a few unusual items, my endeavor at first was met with pessimism from Perla, almost excited to see me fail, waiting for an “I told you so moment!” However, once the smells of the curry and the sautéed vegetables started pouring out of the kitchen, Perla could not be contained, she started jotting down the ingredients, preparation methods, asking questions about spices, why some things were sautéed, others steamed. The anticipation was killing her. Finally after a few hours of grating coconut, countless market runs, and difficulty with the rice, we had our Market Halo Halo. Perla gave it a 95, she is after all one of the best Filipino cooks I have met, and has worked abroad cooking in Saudi and Chinese homes.
Today’s Prayer:
As if I didn’t already have enough going on. If you’d already read my previous post about my kitchen, leaky roof, blah blah,blah. And that tent is looking better all the time.
In our headlong rush to be able to supply eBooks, many publishers have failed to think about how fundamentally different the new world is. Replicating print books as eBooks and disseminating them through intermediaries as lots of us are currently doing is an important first step. Indeed the company I work for is engaged in facilitating this process for publishers – because the publishers we work with are asking us for this service.
My GBV journey began on a tip from none other than Bob Mould. Oh, I'd read about them, been intrigued, and in fact I may had even purchased a CD of theirs by the time I met Bob Mould at a Sugar gig in December 1994 (though I really think I didn't own anything until early '95, honestly). But what really got me into the band was Bob's enthusing about them to me and a couple other people while chatting with him for nearly an hour before the Sugar gig that night. At the time, Bob was still in the thick of the alternative scene, not yet having gone the dance route, so anything tipped by him was assumed to be golden. And of course they were.
“Just Cady, maybe Lindsay.”
On that note, I’m off to Victoria Falls tomorrow and I won’t be doing any training till the New Year (everyone needs a break right? RIGHT? AGREE WITH ME DAMMIT)
up about fifty miles from each other in the same part of Indiana. So, still feeling responsible for Lee, Jack decides to take her home to spend Christmas with his mother (Beulah Bondi) and aunt (Elizabeth Patterson) and their hired hand (Sterling Holloway).
Although, the elites allow Muslims to what they like to us and our communities they exploit them in their own countries. There have been reports of our elites using sweated labour in Bangladesh.
2 slices of bread
now i'm going to go nourish my skin with anything that contains aloe vera, i'm really sun burnt. ouch.
Nov 20 Indianapolis, IN — Murat Theatre at Old National Centre
fill cherry tomatoes,
I move on to your other present crop of office bearers.
In 2005, six orphanages in Hunan Province were caught buying babies from area traffickers. Although those six orphanages largely ceased participating in the international adoption program after the exposure, many other orphanages inside China have continued to buy babies from traffickers unimpeded. Press stories by ABC News, the L.A. Times, and others show that buying babies is still prevalent, and statistical analysis reveals that a majority of children adopted from China entered the orphanage through Family Planning confiscations, outright purchase, or through other "incentive" programs. Rather than being safe-havens for unwanted and abandoned children, China's orphanages are more accurately described as businesses, seeking to maximize its benefit like any other profit-seeking enterprise.
The Holy Grail Epics ALL took place in France where part of King Arthur’s Kingdom extended in Brittany’s peninsula and this is WHY the Merlin/Myrddin, Emrys Ambrosius is buried there in the Forest Bróceliande in France to this day… because for a time, Arthur’s Throne was in Brittany after the 10th Battle at Mount Badon where Britain was United after Rome’s fall near the time of the Unity of France under Clovis I the King of the Franks in Gaul/France. This was in the 5th Century CE.
Director Tim Story mixes it up, keeping all the multiple storylines in play without so much as a hiccup in pacing or narrative. This could have ended up a two-hour commercial for Harvey’s book, but Story shifts the focus to the individual characters and not the pages of Harvey’s narrative. Screenwriters Keith Merryman and David A. Newman let you see the action from all sides, so this feels like a true ensemble film instead of a man or woman-bashing screed. And as an ensemble piece, it’s tough to pick out the truly outstanding performances, because the actors do such a wonderful job working with each other. That said, Kevin Hart (Kevin Hart: Seriously Funny) is brilliant as always, and manages to steal just about every scene he’s in. His post-divorce bitter manchild is an absolute hoot. And D.C. native Taraji P. Henson brings a softness to her COO that weighs a man’s net worth higher than a man’s heart. Well, at first anyway.
LABOUR: sc
"THIS IS A CRISIS!!!" I shout and order him into the shower with our son, who is still screaming. Poor Ike, I poured a cup of water in his mouth, he sputtered, screamed, I poured another. And another. I am sure he thought he was the victim of what Congress has deemed not to be torture. But, what else was I supposed to do? How else does one remove poop from a one year old's mouth??
And over in St James' they take cardio rehab seriously enough that an hour of cardio exercise, is followed by half an hour of relaxation therapy.
Pollination is the most important aspect of the growing process. While the fruits are typically growing, you can boost its efficiency by applying a special substance (usually available from your local store) to the trees that lures the bees. Experts recommend to add this to the trees only following sundown, or in the early daybreak.
Thank you for all who voted! Now on to my super simple project for this week!
I do not know what he said, but it was not complimentary.
In our heart, we all know what's right; young and old, left and right, black and white. Thousands of people risk their lives every day for a taste of what we take for granted, and are in the process of squandering forever.
The first two roads to be opened up in the new County of Irwin were the Roundtree Trail and the Coffee Road. The former extended from Pulaski County across the headwaters of the Alapaha River and entered present Tift County near Tifton, and then down the Little River. However, the Coffee Road became the great thoroughfare of travel.
It could not be more beautiful than that moment.
-Look for Amazon coupons that you can clip for greater savings.
posted by kennamatic at
The Return of the King
In today’s article we’ll be going over what us at jailbr3akpod and you the readers wanna see in the xbox 720.
It was very sunny and hot on race morning. With an 8 am start, we already had temps into the upper 80's. I'm so glad we both decided to carry our own water bottles. We drove the course Friday night, so I knew it was pretty hilly. I wanted to take a conservative approach to the race as a whole, trying to finish without passing out or having a heat stroke.
ps: pretty soon I'll show you guys a pic of that insanely awesome mk2k jacket i got awhile ago
What a great lesson for me. I am trying to stay motivated to write my unschooling book while working on Daddy 365, and simultaneously trying to be a good Dad and partner. Recently, I got a small "from home" consulting gig that is occupying my thoughts as well as my time, which is great but adds another level of engagement in a new project. As I watch my son effortlessly guide himself past obligation and into a place that works best for him, I can feel a shift of my own priorities to get back to simple basics a bit. Not sure where that will lead or if it will even stick, but I am definitely thankful for his positive example.
Cheerio.
"After which you promptly broke her heart again."
Not only do I refuse to be punished for my talents I also refuse to be smothered by others.
But first I want to show you all a layout my Scrapbooking Clubs did in March. I love to use our Designer Series Paper in unexpected ways......
After three continuous days of packing and hauling and pinched fingers and mild, stifled cursing we locked our dorm room door and now I ache.
Oh...and my favorite story of the week. You remember Erialdo and Sílvia, right? The ones that Sister Grant and I found last week that were super excited about the Book of Mormon? Well, they´ve been pretty hard to teach this week because they are both very busy with work and have had family visiting this week for the holidays. But we´ve been trying to stop by regularly to talk to them and to see if they´ve had questions about what they´ve been reading. Well, last night we stopped by on our way home just to quickly say hi and ask how they were doing. Sílvia was waiting for us and ushered us inside her warm house were she had hot chicken soup already waiting on the table (Did I tell you that these people are amazing??) While we were eating I told her how grateful we were for all the kind things they always do for us and for always treating us like we were family. Sílvia just smiled and starting telling us about a song that she had heard as a child and has always loved- a song about God putting angels in people´s path to guide them and to be His messengers. She told us that recently she had been praying that God would help her focus her life more around Him and feel His influence and guidance more strongly in her life. Sílvia told us that it makes her happy to help us because she believes that we are the answers to that prayer. She said that the moments that we have helped them sit down together and pray as a family and talk about God have brought a spirit of peace into her home and she thanked us for helping them feel His presence more strongly in her home. What an amazing and loving person!!! I know that Heavenly Father brought us to her home so she will find the joy and the love that the gospel of Jesus Christ brings! He is anxious to give this gift to every one of His children that will receive it...and he is always leading us to them :)
Since August 5th I have:
I’d be Jude. And what name would you be after having yourself? I thought.
When they took sick, right at the start, I saw a doctor.
I arrived quite tarnished and fairly tired. And will go onwards by the morning or the next day. But for today I am finally in Italiano and am pleased to have arrived safe and sound in Trieste. It is very interesting to see such a place all the piazzas and open space. There is no open spaces in English cities. I don’t count parks. Caffe couture and merlot. Aperatif if Campari. Picante pancetta. Local cheese and I feel truly bamboozled…
Stephen: " Let me guess, there's an egg."
The legal definition of insanity pends on whether you knew what you were doing or not. Apparently, the idea is if you can string a sentence together or are able to make any kind of sensible action, then you know what you are doing. If you could be considered to be crazy at all, you would be crazy like a fox. Many people seem to think of Britney this way and I suppose I am identifying with her because in many ways, the attitudes that people have towards her are similar to the attitudes that people had towards me when I was younger.
paid: $4.78
What’s up with that?
Now, the Prime Minister is not voted into office, like the President of the United States. His party is voted into office and the leader of that party automatically becomes the Prime Minister. This is because Malaysia follows the British Westminster system. But how does the Prime Minister become the leader of his party, and therefore the Prime Minister of Malaysia?
When I came home the house was immaculate. Carissa and a friend had cleaned it from top to bottom. She'd also done all of her washing, fed and groomed the cats, enjoyed a home cooked flat head dinner and rearranged and de-cluttered her room. And she said "You should go away more often. I completed three essays and read a bunch" and that made me feel both proud and not missed. What can I say? We raise our children to live without us. Mine is doing just fine at the moment and she's almost 17.
The Vizio HDTV 37″ VX37L may not have received as much attention as other 37 inch LCD models but don’t let that fool you. This TV might fall under the radar amongst its better known competitors however one area that it does not fall behind in is quality. Vizio are known for selling affordable televisions but this can lead people to think that the TV’s are cheap or not well made.
Mixed by: Peter Chemist, Patrick, Don Ricardo & Dub Rock
For the past few years, my family has spent Sunday of Labor Day Weekend at the Rib Cook Off in Sparks, Nevada. Right up there next to Reno. If you've never been to the Reno area you can't really imagine what the sweltering heat is like with hundreds of large barbecues roaring in a small vicinity.
What is Blog Me MAYbe? It’s a blogging challenge for the month of May. Clink on the graphic to find out more. It’s being hosted by writer and blogger, Sara McClung. On her page you can see a list of the different blogs that are participating.
Nestled in bushland about an hour from the city on the Warburton Trail, this unique café is fantastic for young families and makes a perfect venue for lunch on a sunny day.
Flowers in the kitchen.
Beginning over a year ago in April 2011, Hanasaku Iroha became my favorite show last year. The immense visual quality from P.A. Works combined with a wonderful growing up story was an absolute joy for me to view. While it had its ups and downs, overall it was a really well-done series. So now we finish the 9 Blu-ray volumes and conclude the series properly until our new work is released. BDInfo/Photobucket album
Forward Roll To Bear Crawl
They will be a valuable addition to my collection.
I am currently eating fresh strawberries and vanilla yogurt as I write this—Liberté’s Mediterrainée is the most wonderful vanilla yogurt you will ever eat…it’s like eating whipped cream on your berries…yum! Yes, the MF is 10%, but it’s more nutritious for you then actual whipped cream and so, so, SO good. Worth it.
Do you revise your work? I do. I spend longer reworking than writing. It is the rare poem that comes out nearly fully formed and my graphic novel series underwent a number of rewrites. Though I think working with another person, in this case, my talented artist means that if the joint effort is to be a success you need to listen and leave the ego at the door.
03 Dearly Beloved (Mercer, Kent) 03:05
And, I am a TOTAL PLANNER, so it is surprising to people that I wait until birth to find out.
Follow the few to get to the many
The Chief exclaimed, 'All the more reason!'
The painting was not merely reproduced, it was examined and interpreted. Marquet caught some of the abstract qualities of Hopper’s work that impressed painters like Willem De Kooning and Mark Rothko – that hard yellow diagonal at the top which both defines and pinches the space inside the diner, the retaining wall which uses a hard curve to suffocate the space even further, segregating the people in the diner from the cruel darkness outside that somehow seems to define them. At the same time, Marquet noticed that the bar could easily be like a coffin, and that the space is ever closing in. She adds a door, but it doesn’t bother us. Rand follows the characters, noticing that Hoppers light does the same, conjuring their presence and moods even in an empty room.
Their eyes stayed locked for a long moment, but it was Taslin who looked away first. "First you must answer for your belligerence."
4 large carrots
On to the project.
*Three Floyds Robert the Bruce … Indiana; 6.5%. … $.$$
SIGNATORIES
Head tilted back,
Optional: Peel the apples
I'd spotted a fairly fresh plank of wood about six feet long, two feet wide, and three inches thick, lying in the yard of the farmhouse as we approached, so I came up with the idea that perhaps we could lay the plank lengthwise across the top of the steps and crawl our way up. Jane's first attempt at laying any weight on the board caused a groan of the old woodwork underneath so severe that I insisted on attempting to reinforce it from below with several odd-length two-by-fours I'd also spotted in the yard outside. (We worked quietly in the light of early dawn, aware that to be caught rooting around like children in the old farmhouse against her grandfather's wishes would earn us a severe talking-to.)
My friends: do I have friends who I can trust to support me? To be there for me? To be positive and who I can talk to when I have a wobble?
May day is your day, like orange peels
Sing with the birds, whistle with the breeze.
WHO AM I DOING THIS FOR?
What is surprising is the renewed interest in the Crossover, SUV, 4×4 sector. This sector near died a death by 2007 because of running costs but has been rescued by the Crossover car concept. A Crossover car is built like a car – not a truck – and drives more like a car with more car like running costs.
Anyways, one film I watched was Prayers for Bobby, which I’m sure a lot of you have seen. I mean, it has Sigourney Weaver, and it doesn’t get any better than her. It was the best gay themed film I’ve ever seen, and probably in my list of favorite movies of all time. It’s just so amazing; the acting is fantastic and the script is equally as good. I’m not going to spoil it for any unsuspecting readers, but the first thing that I thought as the credits rolled was, “My mom should really watch this!” She isn’t very gay friendly, and I think this film would really impact the negative ideology she has of gay culture. The movie just has so many lessons that I would never be able to get her to understand through plain old conversation, and that brings me to the purpose of this post. If there’s something on your chest that your struggling to tell someone, maybe find a film that portrays the message better. Or a song, or a picture, or even a poem. It could be anything. These are such effective means of communication that aren’t utilized to their fullest potential, and it’s really a shame. So many miscommunications could be avoided if people didn’t only rely on their own words.
Cheryl Cole has launched her first lipstick and it’s all in the aid of raising money for her foundation which is in association with the Price’s Trust. The Lipstick which is titled the Red Passion – Shade No. 297 – will have a £1 donated to her foundation which every sale.
This book is a popularized, illustrated version of Briggs’s AN ENCYCLOPEDIA OF FAIRIES, with more tales and fewer scholarly treatises. I guess it was intended for kids. Born in 1898, Briggs was 81 when it was published (she died a year later), and her foreword sometimes brushes against that patronizing tone writers used to adopt when addressing children. “I hope you will enjoy the book,” the introduction concludes, “and perhaps become a folklorist, collect stories for yourself, and tell them to other people.” (My second grade teacher talked like that.)
In the prelude to reading the slightly-larger-than-sane pile of biographies of Forster I seem to have accidentally acquired (and later, no doubt, returning to the increasing mound of Lawrence biographies, all of which are endearingly ancient bindings and smell irresistibly of second-hand-book-shop, a heady perfume of dust, vanilla, leather, decaying canvas, and ink), I can make all kinds of assumptions about how Forster felt about his romantic & sexual identity, and no doubt in the aftermath of the same I shall continue to wonder, since none of us can actually know.
In fact Nanny is offering householders in the "at risk" areas free sandbags to build barriers around their properties
Lorie
I would muse more on this decline if people would stop asking me how work was going...
of something we want
We are really lucky to have such wonderful friends. Some of those friends volunteered to have your big sister stay with them tonight so she wouldn’t have to get up super early in the morning. So, I was over at their house for a while tonight just hanging out and then she didn’t want to go to sleep so I had to spend more time than I had anticipated trying to get her to sleep so she wouldn’t be scared. The work of a mommy is never done, that’s for sure! I just hope she sleeps ok and that she doesn’t wake up scared during the night or in the morning.
After all, when in Rome, do as the Romans do (ride around on scooters all day, shouting obcenities and gesticulating widly with your arms, then drinking your sorrows away with some buono vino rosso - still on the scooter).
Lemonade (store-bought, but next time I’ll make it myself).
But this year I've been struggling with feeling absent. And a part of that, for me, means continuing to struggle with what it means to be a mom in a two-mom family. If Co is inhabiting the role traditionally given the "mom" (as far as shuttling the kids around), then who am I? There are many excellent answers to that question, but there have been some dark times this year when I didn't think there was one at all.
If there's one thing that all vegans have in common, it's that we LOVE to eat. Thankfully, for most of us who don't live in vegan meccas like Portland or New York, our dining out options are somewhat limited. In other words, when we go to the all-you-can-eat buffet, well, it's probably a good thing there's only a few dishes we can eat. But last night, I experienced what non-vegan food addicts must feel every day — food coma!!!!!!!!
My Braxton-Hicks contractions have not lessened, but they haven't worsened either, and although my body has apparently undergone some changes in the past five weeks, the doctor is still not concerned about pre-term labor at this point. In fact, he had very little to say today in general, which I take as a good sign. At this point, the doctor will see me every two weeks until mid-September; at that point I will have weekly appointments. This Wednesday also marks the start of our third trimester, so we are incredibly thankful to reach that milestone.
Do you know it was only YESTERDAY did I realize a FRIDAY THE THIRTEENTH was upon us? And yes, you shoud say "FRIDAY THE THIRTEENTH" in ominous tones. Actually, I never have issues with FRIDAY THE THIRTEENTH. Now Saturday the Fourteenth is ALWAYS wonky, so I'm really bracing myself for tomorrow.
Wang Lung is forced to take his family to a southern city for the winter. There, O-lan and the children beg while Wang Lung earns money by transporting people in a rented rickshaw. They earn just enough money to eat. Wang Lung begins to despair of ever making enough money to return to his land. He and O-lan briefly consider selling their
Let’s just say I didn’t feel too attractive.
Though the team’s performance on the pitch has been less than sterling, South Africa has hardly been burnishing its image as the host country.
Reagan (almost 4) is like Mackenzie in that she's very independent. She likes to do everything herself, which at times is a big help and at other times we have to keep her out of things. Most of the time she is very eager to please and tends to just roll with things. Of course she has her days, especially when it comes to eating dinner. She loves lunch but protests most dinners. She loves wearing princess dresses and dressing up. She too likes to sing, is taking gymnastics, which she enjoys, and she learned to swim this summer. She has beautiful swimming arms for a child her age! I was amazed at how well Reagan and Ashley cooperated with swimming this summer and actually let ME teach them. Reagan is also constantly throwing compliments my way. How nice! I can't say I'm complaining! But she is very sweet and does tend to take the role of peacemaker in her home the most and it is appreciated.
12 Chicken Thighs (skin on)
I would love to know how they sold but even if the Widmers shared the data it would be hard to interpret It is hard to de-trend and isolate an individual beer's effect on sales. By this I mean that if you bought an X-114 and loved it and went back and bought the IPA again, you might have missed the X-114 and picked up a Falconer's. When you did so you might not have noticed the change or you might have noticed the change but figured that since you liked the X-114 your would give the Falconer's a try.
Muz is an experienced burlesque performer with signature acts that include a fake severed hand and a giant bubble big enough to fit a person inside. She’s been part of the Whitney Biennial (2004), a well-known art exhibition in New York for emerging visual artists, as well as winning the Miss Exotic World and Miss Coney Island pageants. She also used to be ‘head mermaid’ at the now-defunct Coral Room in New York, where she swam in a 34,000 litre tank for customers of the bar. In February, she’ll be in Melbourne to perform her Apocastrip Wow! show with fiancé and stage-partner Mat Fraser, and it’s quickly becoming clear that from Muz’s perspective, being open intellectually is hardly any different to being naked on stage doing her eccentric live shows.
Our friends told us to go to a candy store, called Winton’s Candy Company in downtown Port Aransas. Anytime the word candy is mentioned, I revert to a toddler like state and throw myself on the ground demanding we go immediately. After all, the four main food groups are candy, candy canes, candy corn and syrup. Right?
The USA may remain the world's leading power, but Europe fades off the global scene and leaves her spot open for Asia. Global affairs will be shaped by the twin pillars of the USA and East Asia, mainly China.
I will definitely run another half at some point, but for now I will just keep running a few times a week without the pressure of a race. Dan and I are doing a 10k on Saturday and it will be fun and a lot easier than a half marathon. Dan is running the Top of Utah marathon on the 17th so hopefully I’ll have a positive post about his experience soon! I can’t imagine running twice as far as I did for this race…barf! But he is a beast and I’m sure he will be amazing!
You can get some real bargains including free books, how good is that!
The truth is this:
Our first doctor’s appointment… was scheduled for seven weeks, but when we went in there we found out I was only 6 weeks along. They wanted to see me back the following week to make sure everything was okay and to hear a higher heartbeat. The heartbeat the first time was only 100 bpm and the second time it had increased to 128 in just a week. After that, we let all of family and close friends know.
Shadow Stalker looked at me, the eyes behind her mask moving to my throat. “Tough costume.”
If you’re not at DAC after all this, well I guess you didn’t want to go, did you?
A year ago, when Being Human concluded its second season, I was pretty sure I was done with the show. Being Human's first season was a fun but underbaked affair, clearly too charmed by its own premise--a vampire, Mitchell, a werewolf, George, and a ghost, Annie, who move into a house in Bristol--to do very much with it. The show's second season took that premise and ran with it, and the result was not only a poor piece of storytelling, but morally revolting. Having rid himself at the end of the first season of his genocidal sire-turned-enemy Herrick and thrown in his lot with humanity, Mitchell discovers that his human girlfriend Lucy is in league with the preacher Kemp, who has sent men to kill Mitchell. Mitchell takes out his anger over Lucy's betrayal on all of humanity, waylaying a passenger train and slaughtering the twenty people on board, but the season ends by concluding that Lucy and Kemp are the true villains.
Subtly pinstriped vest, H&M. White lace blouse, Newport News. Velvet dress, NY & Co (shortened by me). Patterned tights, Merona. Black patent slingbacks, Audrey Brooke. Circular brooch, thrifted.
I've missed my internet beer friends, let's catch up.
I have really enjoyed posting this month on the theme The Making and Selling of Books, because I am so passionate about the topic.
I hope everyone is enjoying the Holiday Season...Take Care Everyone!!
I'm not sure that I've ever mentioned (although I may well have, if you've been reading all this nonsense for the past six years there is little of my life that you do not know) that I have two ways of keeping young children quiet while waiting to be served in restaurants. The first is teaching them that particular verse of the W. and the C. - it takes children a surprisingly long time to pick it up accurately, possibly because it is more-or-less nonsense (I've never yet had to move on to Jabberwocky) and the second is napkin folding. I teach them the waterlily and the slipper, both of which are quite simple to do but take some practice to learn. When I was quite small, my mother used to get me to fold the napkins when she had friends round for dinner. I realise, of course, that it was just to get me out of her hair so that I wouldn't try her patience by 'helping' in the kitchen. But that's okay. It's proved its use over the years.
The blond, wiry dealer, 52, who founded the store in 1986 after a stint at Christie’s, has become a public figure with his twin brother, Leslie, the director of American furniture and decorative arts at Sotheby’s. They have been profiled in New York and People magazines, published a memoir and appeared in 14 seasons of “Roadshow.” (Sometimes one can be spotted chatting up visitors in the background while the other is appraising on camera.) For two decades, until this year, Leigh Keno also rented a booth in January at the entrance to the Winter Antiques Show in Manhattan, which opens on Friday. Since he announced his auction business last summer, he said: “I’m so energized, I feel like I’m 28 again. I loved being a dealer, but it was time for me personally for a new challenge.”
The prologue hooked me from the very beginning, after I read those two short page I was like, "WOW! I really have to do some intense reading like now!" The quote that really had me very intrigued was "My name is Mia Price, and I'm a human lightening rod. Do they make a support group for that? They should, and let me tell you why. My name is Mia Price, and I'm a lightening addict!" This prologue sets the tone for the whole book.
So engine manufacturers find different solutions to ease the stresses and braking effect of the driver lifting off the throttle. In the seasons before EBDs there were several different strategies in place, the driver was able to alter overrun setting to tunes the cars handling, and driver switching between teams found the change in overrun settings needed some adjustment to both their driving style and sometimes with the engines settings. So overrun settings were already an issue before EBDs, and many strategies were already outside the intentions f the 10% rule.
One reaps as he sows.
'Why?' I said.
Rating
There are poor beers of course but there are more classics and Great Beers than you can shake a stick at, they are held in such mighty reverence across the pond too
Sleep deprivation?
I was a bit worried starting the book because I’d found her last one (The Spell Book of Listen Taylor) very hard-going. Thankfully I didn’t need to be at all. In fact, I thought it was up to the same standard as Finding Cassie Crazy (though I should mention it’s much longer weighing in at over 500 pages!). It’s cleverly written in the shape of exam essays, meeting minutes and online conversations, with themes and seemingly unconnected details and multiple point-of-views all blending to create a gem of a book. Put that way, it sounds kind of like high literature. And it could be. This should be read in schools and then maybe more people would read. But that’s by the by because what really matters is that it is a book that teens will love.
In this case, Drew, the main character had me wondering whether the author was male or female, because apart from a few stereotypical bits, SHE had got the male viewpoint really well which is often difficult.
We'd been allocated some of the best cabins on the ship, a reasonably spacious room with its own private balcony. A bottle of champagne was sitting on ice and a fruit platter was pounced on for its treasured banana inclusion.
Being new to Bombay, I was carrying a letter of introduction to Mr. K M Munshi, a man of erudition, who had embellished public life in so many ways. He had also earned a niche for himself as the founder of Bharati Vidya Bhawan, a trend-setter in the academic world. Too reticent to open up at one go, it took several meetings to find him as a warm, affectionate and effusive person.
Zambians are also very social people. Part of the outward grieving is to let their family and friends know that they are sad and in need of special comfort. The entire village will gather at the sound of the wailing and wail also to show camaraderie and community.
It’s also a great way to explore contradictions of character. Everyone’s experienced displaying completely different emotions and feelings outside than they do inside. From something as mundane as being bored at a party but hiding it under a veneer of politeness to internally screaming for your enemy’s blood while enjoying a round of mini-golf, first person narratives are made to explore those contradictions. They also help to explain actions that might otherwise be seen as illogical and out of left field. There’s nothing worse than a character doing something that leaves the reader confused and spluttering that the character simply wouldn’t do that while the author insists that there’s some kind of internal conflict there that explains everything. First person gives a unique perspective on a character’s thoughts and motivations.
Again it would perhaps be easy to forget that the rest of the world was continuing to turn and many events were to occupy the minds of Bishops at the Lambeth conferences of 1908 and 1920 before the new prayerbook was to come before parliament in 1927 for approval. Arrangements for relationship with other provinces, the facility of divorce, the use of contraception, the role of women in the church reflecting the rise of suffrage, racism, business ethics, of marriage and sexual immorality, the reunion of Christendom, the rise of organised labour and
green chilly - 2
